Twenty-third plenary meeting
22 October 1985 at 10.15 a.m.  President: Mr TODOROV (Bulgaria)  Vingt-troisième séance plénière
22 OICTFf6pR 1985 r. B 10.15  npencenaTenb: r-H TOHOPOB (Bonrapm)
827    DISPATCH OF A CABLE TO THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED NATIONS GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON  THE OCCASION OF THE FORTIETH ANNIVERSARY OF THE UNITED NATIONS ORGANIZATION  ENVOI D'UN TELEGRAMME AU PRESIDENT DE L'ASSEMBLEE GENERALE DES NATIONS UNIES  A L'OCCASION,DU QUARANTIEME ANNIVERSAIRE DE L'ORGANISATION DES NATIONS UNIES  ENVIO DE UN TELEGRAMA AL PRESIDENTE DE LA ASAMBLEA GENERAL  DE LA ORGANIZACION DE LAS NACIONES UNIDAS  HAiiPABJIEHHE TEJIEïPAMMbi IIPEHCEIIATEJIK) I'EHEPAJIbHOn ACCAMBJIEH  OPïAHHSAiJHU OB'bEHHHEHHbiX HAUHft i70 CJIY9AH) COPOKAJIETHR OOH  DE LAS NACIONES UNIDAS, CON MOTIVO DEL CUADRAGESIMO ANIVERSARIO  o LYI + LLS r%"3r ccj;i, .-L+, J ~ I  ,-SU 'LUI dd '41 J L ~ I   .%dl y91  &@&B ta &ì%& D-I-WF r)rPif%@&Q ta &AB *h% &?JY
1.1 Le PRESIDENT :  La séance est ouverte. Mesdames et Messieurs, je voudrais tout d'abord  vous informer que, à la suite des suggestions exprimées par de nombreuses délé-  gations et avec l'accord du Bureau, il m'a été demandé d'envoyer un télégramme au  Président de l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies à l'occasion du quarantième  anniversaire de l'organisation des Nations Unies. Si vous en êtes d'accord, je  vais demander au Secrétaire de vous donner lecture du texte du télégramme qui a  été approuvé par le Bureau hier matin et que j'adresserai en votre nom au Prési-  dent de 1 'Assemblée générale de 1 'ONU.
1.2 Je donne la parole au Secrétaire.
2. Le SECRETAIRE :  Merci, Monsieur le Président. Le texte du télégramme qui sera adressé  par le Président de la Conférence générale au Président de l'Assemblée générale  des Nations Unies se lit comme suit :  "A l'occasion de la célébration du quarantième anniversaire de la  création de l'organisation des Nations Unies, j 'ai le plaisir de vous  exprimer l'appui et le soutien de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco,  actuellement réunie à Sofia pour sa vingt-troisième session, à l'action  inlassable menée par l'organisation des Nations Unies pour le maintien  de la paix dans le monde, le dgveloppement de la compréhension mutuelle  et le renforcement de la coopération internationale.  de l'Unesco est convaincue que les idéaux qui ont présidé à la création  de l'ONU et qui ont guidé son action au cours de ces quarante années  sont plus que jamais actuels et appellent une adhésion sans réserve de  la communauté internationale.  Devant les tensions qui secouent le monde, la Conférence générale  Nikolal Todorov  Président de la Conférence générale."  Je vous remercie.  Puis-je considérer ce télégramme comme approuvé ?
3.1 Le PRESIDENT :
3.2 En l'absence d'objections, il est approuvé.
4.1 Le PRESIDENT :  Mesdames, Messieurs, vous vous souviendrez que lors de la huitième  séance plénière, le vendredi 11 octobre 1985, la Conférence générale a, au titre  du point 2.3 de l'ordre du jour et sur recommandation du Bureau, décidé d'orga-  niser comme suit l'examen de la décision du Conseil exécutif reproduite dans le  document 23 Cl93 : (a) renvoyer les questions mentionnées au paragraphe 2 de  cette décision au Comité juridique pour examen préliminaire ; (b) renvoyer les  questions mentionnées aux paragraphes 3 et 4 de cette même décision à la  Commission administrative pour examen préliminaire ; (c) demander au Comité  juridique et à la Commission administrative d'adopter leur rapport sur ces deux  questions le 18 octobre 1985 au plus tard ; (d) consacrer les séances plénières  du 22 octobre 1985 à l'examen des rapports du Comité juridique et de la Com-  mission administrative sur ces questions.
4.2 Aujourd'hui 22 octobre, nous allons comme convenu consacrer les deux  séances plénières de la journée à l'examen de ces questions.
4.3 Les documents à prendre en considération sont : le document 23 Cl93 ; le  document 23 C/LEG/3, qui fixe le mandat du Comité juridique ; le document
23 C/ADM/4, qui fixe le mandat de la Commission administrative ; les docu-  ments 23 C/102 et 23 CI102 Add. et Corr., qui constituent le rapport de la  Commission administrative ; le document 23 Cl103, qui constitue le rapport du  Comité juridique .
4.4 Le Comité juridique et la Commission administrative ont en outre pu  disposer de tous les documents nécessaires à leurs travaux ; ces documents sont à  la disposition de la Conférence générale, en particulier le document 23 ClINF.21  (Conséquences du retrait d'un Etat membre - Rapport du Directeur général
4.5 Je me propose d'organiser notre débat de la façon suivante : je vais  d'abord inviter le Président du Comité juridique, puis le Président de la  Commission administrative, à venir nous présenter les rapports respectifs de ces  deux organes ; puis je demanderai aux délégations qui veulent intervenir dans le  débat de se faire connaître et j'ouvrirai ensuite le débat.
4.6 J'invite le Président du Comité juridique, M. Guellouz, à présenter le  rapport de ce Comité.
(5.1) M. GUEUOUZ (Tunisie), président du Comité juridique (traduit de l'arabe) :  Monsieur le Président, après vous avoir prié d'excuser ma récente absence  parmi vous, absence due a des raisons techniques qu'il serait trop long d'expliquer,  j'ai l'honneur de vous présenter le rapport du Comité juridique concernant le
831    point 2.3 de l'ordre du jour intitulé "Rapport du Conseil exécutif sur sa propre  activité en 1984-1985, y compris le processus de réformes" (doc. 23 C/93,  déc., 122 EXl5.1.1, Partie III, par. 2 (a) et (b)).
(5.2) ' La Conférence générale, sur recommandation de eon Bureau et conformément à  l'article 32, paragraphe 1 (c), de son Règlement intérieur, a décidé de soumettre à  l'examen préliminaire de son Comité juridique les aspects juridiques des questions  énumérées aux alinéas (a) et (b) du paragraphe 2, Partie III, de la décision
122 EX15.1.1 du Conseil exécutif qui figure dans le document 23 C/93, L'objet de ces  deux alinéas est (a) d'examiner et de définir les droits et les obligations réci-  proques de l'organisation et d'un Etat membre qui s'en retire et qui pourrait sur sa  demande avoir le statut d'observateur et (b) d'étudier l'opportunité de demander à la  Cour internationale de justice un avis consultatif sur les obligations financières  d'un Etat membre qui se retire de l'organisation au cours d'un exercice budgétaire.
(5.3) Le rapport du Comité juridique sur ces deux questions, soumis à la Confé-  rence'générale sous la cote 23 C/103, se compose de deux parties. La partie A est  consacrée à l'examen et à la définition des droits et obligations réciproques de  l'organisation et d'un Etat membre qui s'en retire et qui pourrait sur sa demande  avoir le statut d'observateur. Conformément à la décision du Comité juridique, cette  partie ne rend pas compte des débats qui ont eu lieu, se bornant à rapporter les con-  clusions élaborées avec l'aide du groupe de rédaction que nous tenons à remercier  ici. Ces conclusions sont présentées aux paragraphes 5 à 8, tandis que le para-  graphe 9 fait état d'une opinion dissidente. Le paragraphe 5 se divise en trois  points numérotés I, II et III.
(5.4) Le point I comprend les trois considérations suivantes : (a) l'Unesco ne  compte que des Etats membres et des Membres associés ; (b) il n'existe pas, dans les  textes régissant l'organisation, de dispositions dont on puisse déduire l'existence  d'un statut spécifique d'observateur ; (c) l'absence de telles dispositions n'a pas  empêché l'Unesco d'admettre l'établissement auprès d'elle de missions permanentes  d'observation, conformément à la pratique internationale généralement acceptée.
(5.5) Le point II, Monsieur le Président, concerne la possibilité pour le Direc-  teur général d'accorder aux représentants accrédités d'Etats non membres certaines  facilités qui consistent, conformément à une décision approuvée par le Conseil exécu-  tif à sa 26e session : (a) dans l'octroi de laissez-passer les autorisant à assister  à toute réunion publique de l'Unesco sans toutefois participer à ses travaux ;  (b) dans l'envoi des documents de l'organisation aux intéressés ; (c) dans l'usage  des salles de travail, restaurants et bars affectés aux délégations permanentes.  L'octroi de ces facilités était essentiellement motivé par, l'espoir qu'elles amène-  raient ces Etats à devenir membres de l'Organisation. De plus, il importe de souli-  gner que chaque fois qu'une communication a été reçue concernant l'établissement  d'une mission permanente d'observation, c'est le Conseil exécutif qui a été chargé de  se prononcer sur celle-ci. Cette procédure est conforme aux dispositions de la Con-  vention de Vienne sur la représentation des Etats dans leurs relations avec les orga-  nisations internationales de caractère universel, qui n'est pas en vigueur, mais qui  est néanmoins considérée par plusieurs Etats comme un pas important dans l'oeuvre de  codification et de développement progressif du droit international. Cette Convention  précise que les Etats non membres peuvent établir des missions permanentes d'observa-  tion si les règles de l'organisation le permettent. D'après cette Convention,  l'expression "Règles de l'Organisation" s'entend notamment des actes constitutifs de  l'organisation, de ses décisions et résolutions pertinentes et de la pratique bien  établie de l'organisation.
(5.6) Quant au point III, Monsieur le Président, il concerne les privilèges et  immunités dont peuvent jouir les représentants et autres membres de la mission perma-  nente d'observation d'un Etat et qui, comme on le sait, sont de la compétence de
(5.7) Monsieur le Président, les paragraphes 6 à 8 du rapport portent sur la défi-  nition du statut d'un Etat qui se retire de l'organisation. Le Comité juridique a  noté que jusqu'à une date récente, il n'y a pas eu de précédent en la matière et que,  de ce fait, les droits et les obligations réciproques de l'organisation et d'un Etat  membre qui s'en retire n'ont pas été définis dans les règles du droit international  et dans la pratique. Aussi le Comité juridique a-t-il estimé que les responsabilités  et les compétences devraient être réparties entre les différents organes directeurs  de l'organisation de la maniare suivante 2 il appartiendrait à la Conférence générale  de définir un cadre et des principes généraux ; l'étude de chaque communication  adressée à l'organisation concernant l'établissement de missions permanentes d'obser-  vation relèverait, qu'il s'agisse d'Etats encore non membres ou d'Etats qui se  retirent, de la responsabilité du Conseil exécutif ; dans chaque cas, afin d'assurer  que soit prise une décision appropriée, il incomberait au Conseil exécutif de négo-  cier avec 1'Etat concerné au sujet des obligations réciproques de l'organisation et  de cet Etat, étant entendu que le Conseil exécutif pourrait charger le Directeur  général de mener des pourparlers à cet effet.
(5.8) Monsieur le Président, sur la base de ces considérations, le ComitC juri-  dique soumet à l'approbation de la Conférence générale, pour servir de cadre à de  tels pourparlers et négociations, les principes suivants : (a> l'examen doit se fon-  der sur deux points importants : (i) protéger les intérêts de l'organisation et veil-  ler B assurer son activité normale et (ii) tenter, dans la mesure du possible, de  préserver le caractère universel de l'organisation ; (b) l'examen de l'opportunité  d'octroyer des facilités à une mission permanente d'observation doit se fonder sur le  fait qu'un Etat s'efforce de promouvoir la coopération avec l'organisation ;  (c) 1'Etat concerné doit assumer les dépenses qui découlent des facilités octroyées ;  (d) dans le cas d'un Etat qui se retire de l'Organisation et demande d'établir une  mission permanente d'observation, cet Etat doit s'acquitter de ses obligations finan-  cisres envers l'organisation conformément aux dispositions de son Acte constitutif.
(5.9) Monsieur le Président, il convient d'attirer l'attention de la Conférence  générale sur le fait que quelques membres du Comité n'ont pas été d'accord avec les  vues exprimées aux paragraphes 7 et 8 du rapport, estimant qu'il ne devrait pas y  avoir de discrimination entre un Etat qui se retire de l'Organisation et un Etat non  membre. Ils ont fait valoir, premièrement, qu'en droit, le principe de la non-  discrimination était inscrit dans l'article 83 de la Convention de Vienne de 1975 et,  deuxiemement, que dans la pratique, il importait par principe que l'organisation  maintienne le contact avec les Etats non membres. A leur avis, un Etat avait le droit  de notifier à l'organisation sa volonté d'établir une mission d'observation et le  Conseil exécutif avait le droit d'envisager l'octroi des facilités nécessaires. Ils  ont ajouté que, comme pour .les autres missions d'observation, 1'Etat concerné devait  négocier une contribution aux frais afférents aux facilités octroyées. Selon eux, en  dehors de cela il n'y avait ni droits ni obligations juridiques établis.
(5.10) Voilà, Monsieur le Président, pour ce qui est de la Partie A du rapport du  Comité juridique. Quant à la Partie B de ce rapport, elle est consacrée à l'étude de  l'opportunité de demander à la Cour internationale de justice un avis consultatif sur  les obligations financières d'un Etat membre qui se retire de l'organisation au cours  d'un exercice budgétaire. Les paragraphes 10 à 18 de notre rapport rendent compte du  débat auquel a donné lieu cette question.
(5.11) Monsieur le Président, le paragraphe 10 du rapport rappelle le mandat du  Comité juridique. Le paragraphe 11 traite de la capacité juridique ratione personae  de l'Unesco de demander a la Cour internationale de justice un avis consultatif, tan-  dis que le paragraphe 12 porte sur la capacité spécifique de la Cour d'examiner la  question de l'interprétation de l'article II (6) de l'Acte constitutif de l'Unesco.  Le paragraphe 13 a trait au pouvoir d'appréciation laissé à la Cour pour ce qui est  de donner ou non un avis consultatif ; il examine le problème de la reconnaissance  juridique de la compétence de la Cour par 1'Etat concerné et les effets juridiques  d'un avis consultatif émis à l'égard de cet Etat, et il évalue les chances d'obtenir  un avis consultatif favorable à l'Organisation. Le paragraphe 14 expose la procédure  qu'il conviendrait d'appliquer si un tel avis était demandé. Le paragraphe 15 indique  que cette procédure serait gratuite et n'entraînerait pas de dépenses internes,  puisque l'organisation aurait essentiellement recours aux compétences qui existent au  sein du Secrétariat. Le paragraphe 16 a trait à l'effet d'un avis consultatif de la  Cour et à la forme que devrait revêtir la demande d'avis consultatif, à savoir celle  d'une résolution de la Conférence générale ou d'une décision du Conseil exécutif. Le  paragraphe 17 rappelle que le Comité juridique a pour tâche de fournir à la Confé-  rence générale les éléments juridiques sur la base desquels l'organisation pourrait,  si elle le souhaitait, soumettre l'affaire à la Cour internationale de justice.  Enfin, le paragraphe 18 expose les dangers qui, selon certains membres du Comité,  résulteraient d'une demande d'avis consultatif, ainsi que leur opinion concernant les  conséquences pratiques d'un tel avis et l'opportunité de négocier avec 1'Etat con-  cerné. La possibilité de modifier l'article 11.6 de l'Acte constitutif a également  été évoquée.
(5.12) Monsieur le Président, le paragraphe 19 du rapport expose les conclusions  auxquelles est parvenu le Comité juridique sur cette question. Ces conclusions sont  les suivantes : (i) l'organisation peut demander à la Cour internationale de justice  un avis consultatif. En effet cette procédure lui est ouverte tant par l'article 96  de la Charte des Nations Unies et par l'article 65 du Statut de la Cour que par  l'article XIV de l'Acte constitutif de l'Unesco et l'article X de l'Accord entre  l'organisation des Nations Unies et l'Unesco ; (ii) conformément aux règles en  vigueur en ce qui concerne la procédure consultative, la demande d'avis doit être  formulée avec précision et porter sur l'interprétation de l'article 11.6 de l'Acte  constitutif dans le cas dont il s'agit ; (iii) il appartient à la Conférence générale  de décider de l'opportunité et de la pertinence de demander un tel avis consultatif à  la Cour internationale de justice ; en cas de réponse affirmative, la Conférence  générale doit soit définir elle-même en termes précis l'objet de la question à poser  à la Cour et la formuler, soit demander au Conseil exécutif de procéder à cette for-  mulation ; (iv) enfin, le Comité juridique a rappelé que conformément aux disposi-  tions en vigueur, l'Unesco n'aurait aucune somme à verser à la Cour internationale de  justice. I1 a également rappelé que, dans la pratique, le délai moyen pour obtenir un
833    avis consultatif de la Cour internationale de justice est approximativement de sept  mois à partir du dépôt de la demande.
(5.13) Monsieur le Président, le Comité juridique a rappelé que la décision de la  Conférence générale de demander, directement ou par l'intermédiaire du Conseil exécu-  tif, un avis consultatif de la Cour internationale de justice sur la question indi-  quée à l'alinéa 2 (b) de la Partie III de la décision 122 EXl5.1.1 du Conseil exécu-  tif ne requiert que la majorité simple.
(5.14) Ce rapport, Monsieur le Président, a été adopté par le Comité juridique à sa  douzième séance, le 19 octobre 1985. Je vous remercie de votre patience et de votre  attention.
6. Le PRESIDENT :  Je remercie le Président du Comité juridique et j'invite maintenant le  Président de.la Commission administrative, M. Kochubey, à présenter le rapport de  cette Commission.
(7.1) M. KOCHUBEY (République socialiste soviétique d'Ukraine), président de la  Commission administrative (traduit du russe) :  Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur général, Mesdames et Messieurs  les délégués, à sa septième séance plénière, la Conférence générale a décidé, sur  recomnandation du Bureau, de renvoyer à la Commission administrative les questions  mentionnées aux paragraphes 3 et 4 de la décision 122 EXl5.1.1 du Conseil exécutif,  reproduite dans le document 23 C/93, pour un examen préliminaire.
(7.2) L'examen de ces questions par la Commission administrative devait porter  ('sur leurs aspects administratifs et financiers, ainsi que sur leurs incidences sur  la question du personnel, à l'exclusion de tout autre aspect" (cf. doc. 23 C/ADM/4).
(7.3) Monsieur le Président, j'ai le plaisir et l'honneur de présenter aujourd'hui  les conclusions de ces délibérations à la Conférence générale réunie en séance plé-  nière. Mais permettez-moi auparavant d'exprimer la satisfaction personnelle que  m'inspire la manière dont la Commission s'est acquittée de sa tâche. Celle-ci a con-  sacré aux questions dont elle a été saisie un débat exhaustif et constructif, qui  s'est déroulé dans une atmosphère sereine.
(7.4) Monsieur le Président, comme vous l'avez noté, les délibérations de la Com-  mission font l'objet du document 23 CI102 intitulé "Rapport sur l'examen des para-  graphes 3 et 4 de la décision 122 EX/5.1.1 (Partie III) dont le texte est reproduit  dans le document 23 C/93". 11 convient de lire ce rapport en même temps que le docu-  ment 23 CI102 Add. et Corr., qui contient les corrections et les ajouts que la Com-  mission a approuvés lorsqu'elle a adopté son projet de rapport, ainsi que le projet  de résolution proposé à la Conférence générale, sur lequel je reviendrai plus tard.
(7.5) Monsieur le Président, il ressort du rapport de la Commission qu'il y a eu  convergence des avis sur les deux principes généraux évoqués aux paragraphes 3 (a) et
3 (b) du document 23 C/93, à savoir : (a) la composition du personnel du Secrétariat  devra constamment, et dans toute la mesure du possible, refléter une répartition géo-  graphique équitable, sans perdre de vue les critères énumérés dans l'article VI,
835    paragraphe 4, de l'Acte constitutif ; (b) pour le recrutement de personnel nouveau,  les ressortissants d'Etats membres bénéficient de la priorité sur les ressortissants  d'Etats non membres, conformément à la disposition 104.2 du Règlement du personnel.
(7.6) Les questions soulevées aux paragraphes 4 (a) et 4 (b) du document 23 Cl93  ont donné lieu à l'expression de points de vue contradictoires. Les avis étaient par-  tagés en ce qui concerne les réponses à donner dans les deux cas suivants : (a) lors-  qu'un Etat membre se retire de l'Organisation, les contrats de durée déterminée du  personnel du Secrétariat ressortissant de cet Etat pourront-ils être renouvelés lors-  qu'ils arrivent à expiration ? (b) si une compression des effectifs est décidée,  cette compression devra-t-elle porter en priorité et à égalité de compétence sur le  personnel ressortissant d'Etats non membres de l'organisation ?
(7.7) Pour les uns, il fallait répondre NON à la question posée au para-  graphe 4 (a) et OUI à la question posée au paragraphe 4 (b), alors que pour les  autres les réponses devaient etre OUI à la question 4 (a) et NON à la question 4 (b).
(7.8) Entre ces deux positions extremes, un certain nombre d'autres points de vue  intermédiaires ont été exprimés. Ainsi, certains ont répondu par l'affirmative non  seulement à la question 4 (a), mais aussi à la question 4 (b), à certaines conditions  toutefois. D'autres ont répondu négativement à la question 4 (a), en faisant la  réserve suivante : dans le cas OU l'on ne pourrait trouver de candidat apte à occuper  le poste en question parmi les ressortissants des Etats membres, leur réponse serait  OUI. D'autres encore ont souligné le caractere très délicat de ces questions et la  nécessité d'agir avec prudence.
(7.9) Monsieur le Président, il me semble inopportun, voire peu sage, de chercher  à reprendre ici les divers arguments avancés à l'appui des différentes opinions et  positions défendues au cours du débat, puisqu'il en est fait état dans le rapport,  bref mais bien équilibré, de la Commission. Je me contenterai d'ajouter que nous nous  trouvons de toute évidence face à une situation sans précédent en raison de l'impor-  tance des compressions de personnel auxquelles l'organisation sera contrainte de pro-  céder du fait du retrait d'un Etat membre et de la possibilité que d'autres Etats se  retirent à l'avenir. D'où la nécessité d'apporter des réponses précises aux impor-  tantes questions soulevées au paragraphe 4 du document 23 CI93, qui, tout en respec-  tant les principes d'équité, les règles et les dispositions qui régissent la fonction  internationale, tiennent compte des difficultés pratiques que rencontrera le Direc-  teur général lorsque le moment sera venu de réduire le personnel du Secrétariat.
(7.10) C'est dans cet esprit, Monsieur le Président, que la Commission s'est effor-  cée de soumettre à la Conférence générale réunie en séance.pléniSre, en vue de parve-  nir à une conclusion, le projet de résolution qui figure au paragraphe 25 du document
23 CIADMI5 Add. et Corr. (publié sous la cote 23 CI102 Add. et Corr.).
(7.11) Ce projet de résolution, qui a été adopté par consensus - avec deux  réserves - est le résultat d'une négociation longue et laborieuse entre les tenants  d'opinions opposées sur ces questions et qui, initialement, étaient respectivement  énoncées dans les projets de résolution 4 et 5 présentés à la Commission, lesquels  ont été retirés pour faire place au projet de résolution de compromis proposé dans le  rapport de la Commission.
(7.12) A cet égard, je tiens à rendre hommage ici aux efforts déployés par les €hi-  nents représentants de l'Algérie (M. Rahal) et de la Jamaïque (M. Wynter), coauteurs  des projets de résolution 4 et 5, qui se sont patiemment attachés à mettre au point  une résolution qui puisse recueillir un consensus.
(7.13) Monsieur le Président, le projet de résolution proposé à la Conférence géné-  rale représente un dosage très subtil de concessions des deux c8tés. Comme toutes les  résolutions de compromis, celle-ci est sans doute loin d'etre parfaite et ne saurait  satisfaire pleinement aucun des tenants des deux points de vue opposés. C'est le prix  qu'il faut payer pour parvenir à une solution de compromis sur cette importante ques-  tion. Mais c'est aussi une preuve que notre Organisation est capable de surmonter les  divergences qui se font jour pour émettre un avis unique au nom de ses intérêts  vitaux. Je tiens donc à remercier sincèrement tous ceux qui, des deux c8tés, bien  qu'ils eussent souhaité apporter certains amendements, se sont abstenus de le faire  pour préserver le consensus.
(7.14) C'est dans cet esprit, Monsieur le Président, que, par votre intermédiaire,  je présente à la Conférence générale le projet de résolution figurant au para-  graphe 25 du document 23 C1102, Add. et Corr. et que j'invite celle-ci à y souscrire.  Je vous remercie.
8.1 Le PRESIDENT :  Je remercie le Président de la Commission administrative et je deman-  derai maintenant aux délégations qui souhaitent intervenir de bien vouloir se  faire connaître, pour dresser la liste des orateurs.
8.2 Le Secrétaire de la Conférence générale va nous lire cette liste.
9. Le SECRETAIRE :  Monsieur le Président, voici la liste des orateurs pour le débat sur le  point à l'examen : Canada, Algérie, Inde, République arabe syrienne, Royaume-Uni,  Venezuela, Kenya, Australie, Pays-Bas, Zambie, Yougoslavie, Tchécoslovaquie,  Belgique, Danemark, République démocratique allemande, Cameroun, Suisse, Chine,  Suède, République centrafricaine, Madagascar, République fédérale d'Allemagne,  Nigéria, Chili, Sénégal, Niger, Union soviétique, Tunisie, Bénin, Japon, Guyana,  Jamaïque, Pakistan, Mexique, Pologne, Argentine, Zimbabwe, Ethiopie, République-  Unie de Tanzanie, Ghana, Mali, France, Brésil, Espagne, République islamique  d'Iran, Zaïre, Soudan, Philippines, RSS d'Ukraine, Trinité et Tobago, Italie,  Portugal, Colombie et Cuba.
10.1 Le PRESIDENT :  Je suppose que l'on peut sans doute considérer la liste comme close.
10.2 Je donne maintenant la parole au délégué du Canada.
11.1 Mr WILSON (Canada):  Thank you, Mr President. May I begin by thanking the Chairmen of the  Legal Committee and the Administrative Commission for their very helpful, very  complete introductions. I have asked for the floor, Mr President, to speak only  to the issues arising out of the report of the Legal Committee. Canada is not  represented on that Committee, and this provides us therefore with the first  opportunity of making plain the Canadian position on these issues. That will not  be necessary in respect of the Administrative Commission's report because I think  those who have survived the two-week marathon are well aware of Canadian thinking  there.
11.2 Mr President, the report of the Legal Committee is both interesting and  helpful; but towards the end, with regard to both these major items, it points in  rather different directions and this creates certain perplexities and embarrass-  ments for me. But I would like to deal with them separately if I may, just to  keep this presentation fairly well structured.
11.3 The Legal Committee, of course, has adopted its report and if I under-  stand the situation rightly, all we have to do is to take note of the report  and - in. taking note of it - to put to use the fruits of the intellectual labours  of that Committee in addressing the issues that belong to our own proper respon-  sibility as the issues on which we sought advice in the first place. Therefore I  should like, by your leave, to plunge at once into the actual substance of these  issues.
11.4 Starting first with section A of the Legal Committee's report, I found  it very interesting, and clearly written, right up to the end of paragraph 6  which is where my troubles began. When I studied paragraphs 7, 8 and 9, I ran  into some very, very serious difficulties. Let me please share my analysis with  you because I hope that as I listen to the other speakers in the debate I may  achieve illumination where at the moment much is darkness.
11.5 Paragraph 7 appears to envisage three things happening when a country  requests or proposes observer mission relationship with Unesco. The first thing  seems to be that the Executive Board studies the proposal in the light of what-  ever 'general principles' the General Conference may have decided to establish as  a policy framework to guide the Executive Board. The General Conference may  indeed act in that way, but of course at the moment we do not have such a set of  principles: that is why we are debating the matter this morning. What I am  anticipating is that a large number of Member States may in fact insist on the  idea that it would be a very useful thing to have some statement of principles,  and I have no quarrel with that idea at all provided we can agree on what they  should be and how the will be interpreted. So that, then, is the first thing: we  have the Executive Board studying a proposal, and this process would appear to be  a kind of a 'credentials committee' or 'jury' process addressing the following  central question: is it in Unesco's interest to encourage the proposed relation-  ship? Now this is very much a call for judgement; it is essentially a political  issue.
11.6 The second event that paragraph 7 envisages is that having studied the  matter, the Executive Board mandates somebody, someone, to talk to the candidate  country's authorities; here we seem to have some kind of a bilateral negotiation  relationship which - according to the text - might be conducted by the Director-  General. I would suggest, Mr President, that the talks might equally well be con-  ducted by some kind of plenipotentiary good offices committee composed of Exec-  utive Board members themselves, or even possibly by some other party, but the
837    main point is that we have no clear idea here of who would be doing the talking  and what kind of a mandate they would have; and already we begin to sense a  certain notion of duplication: if the General Conference has established general  principles and then along comes the Executive Board and starts studying the  matter, obviously it will be bound by those general principles but what further  instructions will it give to the mandated representatives? That is one of the  questions which began to trouble me. The negotiators would have to know exactly  what their authority was for negotiating, and they would have to report back then  to the mandating authority which - according to paragraph 7 - would appear to be  the Board.
11.7 The third thing that is envisaged in paragraph 7 is that the Board  takes, and I quote, 'a reasoned decision'. Well, the question then arises: what  is it that - according to paragraph 8 - the next General Conference would have to  approve? I am assuming, Mr President, that the reasoned decision mentioned in  paragraph 7 would be the decision to accept an observer mission relationship with  all that that implies as set out in paragraphs 5 II and 5 III of the report. Now,  if the Board has so decided, then what is left for the General Conference to  approve? This creates a very serious problem for me, because it tends to beg the  question of whether the Executive Board's reasoned decision would have been taken  ad referendum or whether its decision would be to recommend something to the  General Conference: if this is all it does, we might lose two full years before  an actual relationship were established between the Organization and an observer  mission. Mr President, I must say that I found the answers to these questions  elusive and by no means clear as I studied paragraphs 7 and 8 in combination.
11.8 Now, let me turn to the issue of the nature of the framework for the  talks and negotiations referred to in paragraph 7. This is where I must actually  address the specific language found in paragraph 8 because it says, 'the Legal  Committee submits the following principles ...I. Now I take it that this means  they agreed by their own processes, perhaps by consensus, that this is what the  Committee thinks we should adopt. Well, I have extraordinary difficulties with  the very idea of accepting what is offered here as general 'principles'. Some of  them make sense; some of them I find quite contradictory. So please bear with me  while I go through them.
11.9 Let me start with paragraph %(a) (i) : here mention is made of the need  'to ensure that [the Organization] can work normally'. I confess I do not know  what that means at all, and would welcome clarification. I have never heard that  during the past 40 years any observer, and there have been many, has ever  succeeded in interfering or even attempted to interfere with the normal working  of the Organization; and I had never imagined that the existence of observers  could possibly threaten normal working; but there is something here that implies  a warning that if we are not careful we might let the wrong kind of observer into  the house and something can start going wrong. I really think that needs clarify-  ing because I cannot in logic accept that this is a consideration that requires  to be stated in this way. I would have expected Unesco to be sufficiently power-  ful and self-confident and well-established after four decades not to need this  kind of - forgive me saying so - rather strange language.
11.10 Paragraph %(a) (ii) it is not very much better; it speaks of preserving  the universal character of the Organization. Well, Mr President, you. cannot  preserve something that does not exist, and I affirm that the Organization does  not at this moment have a universal character. It cannot possibly have it until  every single country in the world, whether sovereign or a dependency, actually  joins. I assume that what the Legal Committee had in mind was the concept, the  ideal, the goal of universality of membership; I could have understood if what  was referred to was the desirability of promoting the spirit of universality  within the Organization; I would have said, certainly, by all means, let US put  that in as a principle. But this is not the language the Legal Committee has  given to us and so I have to tell you that I have stumbled over that.
11.11 The next paragraph, 8(b), says that consideration should be based  on '... the fact of a State's endeavouring to promote co-operation ...'. Here  again, I do not understand how - and I speak with all the respect an economist  could possibly offer to lawyers - I do not understand how lawyers could think  that you could regard such a thing as an establishable fact. Surely it would  become a judgement call; there would be as many opinions about the intentions or  goodwill of some candidate State as there would be members of the commission or  committee; I do not think - and I invite reconsideration of that formulation -  that it makes sense to speak of that sort of thing as beinu a fact that can be  subjected to a litmus paper test, pink or blue, yes or no; it is in fact a judge-  ment call and it becomes a political issue, and if it is a political issue it  does not belong in a legal formulation of principles. Now, I do not exclude the  idea of including political considerations in a set of principles if they are in  the best interests of all the membership; but I say that the Legal Committee
23  appears to have offered us for our acceptance something that steps well beyond  the bounds of the legal competence that was theirs to draw upon when they gave us  their advice.
11.12 The third paragraph, 8(c), is probably the easiest one. It says here,  'the State concerned should bear the costs arising from the facilities granted'.  I would have no trouble with that, but I would seek an answer to the following  question: if we have not been doing this, if this is a new principle and if we  have not been doing this for the past 40 years, are we going (I know we will not  be doing this retroactively) but are we going to be saying that this rule on a  non-discriminatory basis will henceforth apply to all observer missions? A great  many of them have been established for many years, and we did not have a rule  like this in force in the first place. NOW, the whole thrust of this paper, this  report, is that the idea of encouraging observers is to help to open Unesco's  door to other countries that may wish to join us and promote the universality  that we all desire. But if we are going to say to everybody who is already an  observer, from now on you are going to have to pay for all the paper, or some-  thing like that, all the documents, then let us be very sure, if we decide this,  that we know what we are doing and that we are not tampering with the original  rationale of putting these sweeteners in the pot for these other observer  missions.
11.13 Lastly, Mr President, I find that paraqraph 8(d) does not have a proper  home within this house at all; I see it as, if not quite a red herring, at least  very largely irrelevant. It goes without saying; we have in the Constitution  Article 11.6 which talks about the financial obligations of a withdrawing State;  I would have thought if we must say something we could just incorporate it by  reference; but it does beg the question, who is to judge whether these financial  obligations have been discharged? Well, as it happens, we know the answer. The  Organization has the power and the right to make its own judgement about whether  obligations towards it exist and have been discharged, but these opinions of the  Organization may or may not be shared by another State that withdraws. Therefore  you have here a kind of Pandora's Box, and if you are going to seek to introduce  this criterion as a condition of possible future observer relationship of any  State that may withdraw, it becomes in fact potentially a self-defeating feature  of the whole apparatus. I would urge the plenary to consider very, very seriously  whether it really makes sense to use this place and this kind of language to  achieve that kind of result.
11.14 Finally, Mr President, I happen to agree with the opinions expressed in  paragraph 9. The first time I read them I realized that they were very much in  line with Canadian thinking. So I would just like to state for the record that I  agree with them.
11.15 Mr President, I can be very much briefer on the question of seeking the  advisory opinion of the International Court of Justice, because the Committee  seemed to be unanimous in agreeing that we could go to the International Court,  and so I can thank them for that; we have no dispute over that. The question then  for us, is whether it was desirable, to use the language of the recommendation  that came to us from the Executive Board. There are just two things I want to say  here. One is that if there is any ambiguity about the relevant article of the  Constitution, i.e. Article 11.6, a much more efficient, quicker and more logical  way to proceed would be by way of amending Article 11.6 on the advice of the  Legal Committee. NOW, there has been some action on this in the wings; there was  a Philippine amendment, which has been withdrawn and so I believe has no standing  whatever; but nevertheless the next General Conference might very well decide to  amend the Constitution and then, I presume, because it affects the interests of  Member States since these will be new obligations, if there is a change it might  require a two-thirds majority. But that is again something that might provide  employment for the Legal Committee two years from now. In any case, it would  certainly be a much bolder stroke, and would remove any ambiguity.
11.16 However, I have been careful, Mr President, not to say that there is  ambiguity, although I may personally happen to think there is. Now let me comment  on what the Legal Committee in paragraph 19(iii) of its report refers to as the  need to 'define in precise terms the subject of the question to be laid before  the Court, and ... to formulate it'. I would like to suggest for purposes of the  debate that the question might be phrased along these lines: 'In the context of  the need to determine the financial obligations that may be owed to the Organiz-  ation by a Member State that withdraws, within the meaning of Article 11.6, is  Article 11.6 open to more than one possible interpretation? If not, what is the  unique and correct interpretation of Article II.6?'
11.17 NOW, I offer that, Mr President, because it seems to me that if there is  ambiguity in Article 11.6, as a lot of States certainly seem to think there is,  my delegation believes that it would be next to futile to seek a Court opinion
839    because all that the Court might do is to tell us the different ways that it  could be interpreted, and we already know what they are. It would not bring us  any closer to the solution of what has become a real political issue in this  Organization. And just to wind up, that political issue is obviously the one that  is touched in paragraph 16 of the report, namely that some Member States  obviously would like to have the moral force of a certain kind of verdict from  the International Court that may or may not be forthcoming.
11.18 But the final remark which I would address to those States which  supported that paint of view would be this: If what you wish to do - and here  again, Mr President, forgive me if I talk very bluntly - is to send a clear  signal to a certain State that has withdrawn and shall be nameless, say-  ing, '... if you ever think of coming back to Unesco, however much we might  welcome you, you are to understand that the price of admission is something like  $43 million in real 1985 dollar terms, and if you are not prepared to pay do not  bother to come back', then we all know what the likely consequences of that  signal will be. If the real hidden motivation here - again, Mr President, I am  not attributing this to anyone, you understand, please do not think I am - but if  the real motivation here is to ensure that a certain State that has withdrawn  never comes back, that is probably the most effective way to go about achieving  it. My own delegation would therefore not wish to be associated with such a poss-  ible result. And that, Mr President, I am offering purely in an analytical spirit  in the hope that it will contribute to the discussion that I know we are going to  find very interesting. Thank you for your patience.
12. Le PRESIDENT :  prendre la parole.
13.1 M. RAHAL (Algérie) :  Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président. Je voudrais à mon tour remer-  cier le président du Comité juridique et le président de la Commission admi-  nistrative pour les rapports qu'ils nous ont présentés. Nous avons pris  connaissance de ces rapports et il me semble qu'ils fournissent à notre débat des  éléments importants de clarification. Le Comité juridique et la Commission  administrative ont eu le mérite de nous fournir ces indications dans les délais  qui leur avaient été impartis. De plus, leurs débats sont demeurés dans les  limites précises du mandat qui leur avait été confié. Ayant hésité quelque peu au  départ à accepter cette procédure, je suis satisfait de la manière dont a été  traitée cette question et je m'appuierai largement sur les éléments qui figurent  dans ces rapports.
13.2 Je l'ai déjà dit, ce débat est fondamental sinon vital pour notre  Organisation et je suis très heureux de voir, au nombre d'orateurs qui se sont  inscrits, que c'est aussi l'avis de l'ensemble de la Conférence. Nous devons donc  tous intervenir dans ce débat en ayant présents à l'esprit les enjeux qu'il  comporte. I1 ne faudrait surtout pas donner à ce débat une signification qu'il  n'a pas. Chacun de nous a pu se rendre compte qu'un grand travail de préparation  a été fait pour conditionner le climat dans lequel nous discutons et faire  apparaître ce débat comme s'inscrivant dans une démarche d'hostilité à l'égard de  certains Etats ou même dans un désir de revanche qu'il est pour moi difficile de  comprendre et qui, bien entendu, ne caractérise la démarche d'aucun d'entre nous  ici. Nous sommes membres d'une Organisation qui se trouve placée subitement  devant une situation non prévue dans ses statuts ni dans ses règlements. L'Or-  ganisation se trouve confrontée à des problèmes qui conditionnent sa survie et  qu'il appartient à la Conférence générale elle-même de régler.
13.3 On pourra donc facilement comprendre notre insistance à ouvrir un débat  comme celui-ci et à obtenir de la Conférence générale sinon des solutions pré-  cises aux problèmes que nous avons indiqués, du moins des indications générales  qui permettront ensuite à la Conférence générale de donner mandat au Directeur  général d'une part, au Conseil exécutif d'autre part, de mettre en application  ces directives. Je voudrais donc que tous nos collègues ici abordent ce débat et  expriment leur point de vue sans aucun complexe, sans penser que leurs déclara-  tions pourront être interprétées comme étant dirigées contre un Etat quelconque  ou comme visant à humilier je ne sais quelle catégorie d'Etats, ou à faire payer  à des ressortissants de ces Etats une attitude politique dont ils ne sont pas  responsables. Ceci dit, Monsieur le Président, je vais revenir aux points qui  nous sont soumis dans le document 23 C/93.
13.4 Ce document pose en fait trois problèmes : deux problèmes de nature  juridique, celui de la position d'observateur - j'utiliserai le terme de position  puisque, dans le rapport du Comité juridique, il est précisé qu'il n'y a pas de  statut d'observateur - et le problème de la possibilité pour la Conférence  générale de demander un avis consultatif à la Cour internationale de justice sur  les obligations financières d'un Etat membre qui quitte l'organisation ; enfin,  Je remercie le délégué du Canada. J'invite le délégué de l'Algérie à
23  un troisième problème, de nature plutôt administrative, qui concerne le personnel  de l'Unesco et les mesures à adopter dans les circonstances présentes et lors-  qu'il s'agira, dans un futur qui peut-être n'est pas très lointain, de réduire ce  personnel.
13.5 Mais ces trois problèmes, outre leurs aspects juridiques ou adminis-  tratifs, s'inscrivent bien entendu dans un contexte politique. C'est précisément  l'objet de ce débat que de placer ces problèmes dans leur contexte politique, de  sorte qu'il ne fait pas double emploi avec les discussions qui ont eu lieu, soit  au Comité juridique, soit à la Commission administrative.
13.6 Mon collègue du Canada a parlé des deux problèmes que j'appellerai  juridiques pour aller très vite. I1 a fait une étude critique et technique du  rapport du Comité juridique et je pense que, dans ce qu'il a dit, il y a des  éléments très positifs que la Conférence générale devrait prendre en compte  lorsqu' elle sera appelée à prendre ses décisions.
13.7 Pour ma part, n'étant pas juriste, je ne vais pas suivre la même méthode  que mon collègue. Puisque le statut d'observateur n'existe pas, que signifie pour  nous qu'un Etat veuille être observateur ? C'est la question que nous devons nous  poser avant de la traduire en termes juridiques. Si l'on se réfère à ce qui a été  fait jusqu'à présent, cette position d'observateur a été accordée à des Etats qui  ne pouvaient pas encore, pour des raisons qui leur étaient propres, devenir  membres de l'Unesco, mais qui sympathisaient avec ses idéaux, s'initiaient à ses  activités et se préparaient à en devenir membres, ou bien encore à des mouvements  de libération qui n'avaient pas encore le statut de gouvernement, mais que nous  reconnaissions comme les représentants de leur peuple, qui étaient donc en mesure  d'informer l'organisation des préoccupations et des besoins des populations  intéressées et d'y défendre les intérêts sur le plan culturel de ces populations.  D'ailleurs, le rapport du Comité juridique fait état des commentaires formulés  en 1951 par le Conseil exécutif lorsqu'il avait admis certains Etats et certains  mouvements de libération à cette position d'observateur. 11 y était dit que  l'octroi des facilités d'observateur "pourrait, dans certains cas, sembler sou-  haitable du point de vue diplomatique : elles pourraient amener certains Etats  qui, pour une raison ou une autre, n'ont pas encore été en mesure d'adhérer à  l'Acte constitutif de l'Unesco, à prendre progressivement part à l'action''. En  somme, c'était une valve à sens unique : la seule voie pour un Etat ou un mou-  vement de libération qui occupait une position d'observateur était de devenir  ensuite membre de l'Organisation.
13.8 Or, nous nous trouvons maintenant dans une situation différente. Nous  avons affaire à des Etats qui sont signataires de l'Acte constitutif, ce qui  n'est pas le cas des observateurs que nous avons admis jusqu'à maintenant. Nous  avons affaire à des Etats qui ont été membres de l'Organisation, je dirai même  plus, qui ont été membres fondateurs de l'Organisation, et qui, à un certain  moment, nous disent qu'ils ne veulent plus faire partie de l'organisation, pour  des raisons qui leur sont propres - et il ne me vient pas à l'esprit, comme je  pense qu'il ne viendrait à l'esprit de personne - de dire que ces Etats n'ont pas  le droit de prendre une telle attitude : cela relève de leur souveraineté pleine  et entière et je ne la conteste pas. Mais alors pourquoi veulent-ils conserver  des liens avec l'Unesco ? C'est là le problème. Pourquoi souhaitent-ils avoir  cette position d'observateur ? Ce n'est que si nous répondons à cette question  que nous pouvons en fait définir l'attitude de l'Organisation, c'est-à-dire les  droits et les obligations des Etats intéressés.
13.9 Ces Etats veulent-ils bénéficier de cette position pour s'informer de  l'action de l'Organisation ? Je pense que dans ce cas, il n'est pas nécessaire  d'être observateur. I1 y a de multiples moyens de s'informer, lorsqu'on veut le  faire, et je ne pense pas que ce soit la justification essentielle de la démarche  qui consiste à demander un statut d'observateur. Est-ce que c'est pour rester en  contact avec l'Organisation ou avec les Etats membres ? Là non plus, je ne vois  pas la nécessité d'obtenir des facilités pour le faire. Les Etats savent comment  prendre contact entre eux, ils savent comment négocier entre eux, je ne vois  pourquoi il faudrait accorder une position spéciale à un Etat pour qu'il soit en  mesure d'être en contact avec les Etats membres. Est-ce pour mener des négocia-  tions, influer sur nos débats, sur nos décisions ? I1 est très important pour  nous de le savoir, afin de déterminer exactement ce que ces Etats attendent de  nous lorsqu'ils demandent à bénéficier de la position d'observateur et ce que  nous devons attendre d'eux. C'est pour cela, Monsieur le Président, mes chers  collègues, que je trouve très instructifs et très intéressants les paragraphes 7  et 8 du rapport du Comité juridique, dans lesquels le Comité propose une pro-  cédure permettant de satisfaire à la fois la nécessité pour l'Organisation de  connaître les intentions d'un Etat qui demande à bénéficier de la position  d'observateur et pour 1'Etat lui-même de. préciser ce qu'il peut attendre de  l'Organisation.
13.10 Je pense donc qu'il est très difficile, au stade actuel de nos débats,  de définir exactement ce qu'est cette position d'observateur puisque, c o m e  je  viens de le dire, elle peut relever aussi des intentions de 1'Etat qui la de-  mande. Je pense donc, comme le Comité juridique, que toute décision concernant  une position d'observateur doit être prise cas par cas. Chaque fois qu'un Etat  demande à bénéficier de la position d'observateur, je pense qu'il faut négocier  avec lui. Mon collègue du Canada s'est demandé qui devrait négocier, en vertu de  quel mandat, dans quelles limites doit se tenir cette négociation, quel est  l'organe qui doit prendre la décision en dernier ressort. Je pense que ce sont  des aspects juridiques, qu'il faudra examiner bien sûr, mais auxquels on trouvera  des solutions lorsque nous aurons pris une décision de principe. D'autre part,  ces contacts entre 1'Etat membre qui souhaite avoir une position d'observateur et  l'organisation, doivent permettre de négocier les obligations auxquelles devra se  soumettre cet Etat lorqu'il bénéficiera de sa position d'observateur. Je pense  que les critères qui sont indiqués ici au paragraphe 8 - et qui peuvent être  améliorés à la lumière des critiques, très pertinentes pour certaines, qui  viennent d'être formulées par le délégué du Canada - constituent un base très  intéressante qui devrait nous être utile lorsqu'il s'agira d'énoncer des prin-  cipes généraux, d'une part, et de mettre au point, d'autre part, une procédure  permettant à un Etat qui se retire de l'organisation d'obtenir, s'il le veut, la  position d'observateur auprès de l'organisation.
13.11 Pour ce qui concerne l'avis consultatif de la Cour internationale de  justice, je dois vous avouer que je n'ai jamais compris toutes les hésitations,  sinon les oppositions, qui se sont manifestées à ce sujet. Là encore, au risque  de me répéter - lorsque certains d'entre nous demandent que la Conférence gé-  nérale s adresse à la Cour internationale de Justice pour obtenir un avis  consultatif sur une interprétation des dispositions de l'un des articles du  Règlement financier, je ne saisis pas pourquoi cette attitude peut être inter-  prétée comme une volonté d'humiliation à l'égard d'un Etat membre, ou bien comme  une attitude d'hostilité à son égard. Je crois qu'il est du devoir de l'Orga-  nisation de savoir exactement ce que signifient les articles de son Règlement  financier et, s'il y a des divergences dans les interprétations qu'on peut en  donner, de recourir à une autorité pour dire le droit. Or, l'Unesco étant un  organisme appartenant au système des Nations Unies, cette situation est prévue  dans toutes les réglementations des institutions des Nations Unies. Le système  des Nations Unies a prévu ce cas et a créé, en prévision de telles difficultés,  la Cour internationale de justice qui, en cas de contestation, doit dire le  droit. Je ne vois pas pourquoi on soulève tant d'objections contre un tel recours  d'autant que, c o m e  cela est dit dans le rapport du Comité juridique, il n'en-  traînera aucune charge financière. Cet avis consultatif, ,d'ailleurs, pourra être  tavorable - ou défavorable - à 1'Etat qui se retire. Mais dans l'un ou l'autre  cas, nous saurons à quoi nous en tenir.
13.12 Certains ont fait valoir qu'un avis consultatif n'est pas contraignant,  mais le problème n'est pas là. Lorsque nous demandons cet avis consultatif, nous  ne nous lançons pas dans la procédure de règlement de ce problème. Pour régler ce  problème, le Conseil exécutif avait chargé à plusieurs reprises le Directeur  général de négocier avec 1'Etat membre qui s'est retiré. Or, ces négociations  n'ont jamais abouti. La demande d'un avis consultatif est une autre procédure,  qui se situe à un autre niveau ; cela ne signifie pas nécessairement qu'elle  doive conduire à un règlement du problème, parce qu'un règlement peut être aussi  un compromis. En l'occurrence, nous voulons connaître la portée exacte de telle  disposition de notre Règlement ; ainsi, l'organisation y verra plus clair et les  Etats membres aussi seront éclairés quant à leurs obligations. Que 1'Etat visé  accepte ou refuse la procédure de la Cour internationale de justice est une autre  affaire. L'avis consultatif que nous demandons, c'est pour nous-mêmes, pour  éclairer nos positions, pour éclairer les devoirs et les obligations de chacun  d'entre nous.
13.13 Ainsi, Monsieur le Président, je pense que la Conférence générale n'aura  aucune difficulté à accepter cette proposition. Une fois la décision prise de  nous adresser à la Cour internationale de Justice, il faudra demander au Comité  juridique de s'atteler à la tâche - qui me paraît difficile - de mettre au point  le libellé de la question que nous voulons poser à la Cour internationale de  Justice. Je n'entrerai pas moi-même dans le détail de cette mise au point, mais  je pense que nous avons parmi nous et au sein du Secrétariat des juristes suf-  fisamment avisés qui pourront se charger de ce travail à la satisfaction de tous.
13.14 J'en viens maintenant, Monsieur le Président, à la question du person-  nel. Chacun de nous est conscient de la difficulté des problèmes soulevés parce  qye, en dehors de leurs aspects purement juridiques, administratifs ou finan-  ciers, ils touchent à des cas humains, à la situation de familles, d'enfants, à  leur avenir et évidemment ceci pèse, qu'on le veuille ou non, sur l'analyse qu'on  peut faire de ces problèmes et aussi sur toute décision que nous serons amenés à  prendre. Qu'il soit clair qu'il n'est pas dans mon intention ni dans celle de
23  personne de porter atteinte à des fonctionnaires dans leur situation personnelle  ni dans celle de leur famille. Néanmoins, tout en ayant toujours présent à  l'esprit ce souci, nous devons également, parce que c'est notre devoir, veiller à  ce que l'organisation puisse fonctionner dans les meilleures conditions possibles  et traiter tous les problèmes qui se posent sur ce plan-là, avec cette préoccu-  pation au premier plan de nos réflexions.
13.15 Monsieur le Président, quel est le problème ? I1 y a en fait deux  problèmes qui se posent lorsque nous examinons la situation du personnel dans les  conditions actuelles. Lorsque 1'Etat membre qui se retire ne dispose que d'un  contingent très faible de fonctionnarres, le retrait de cet Etat n'affecte pas  tellement le Secrétariat. I1 y a eu dans le passé des retraits d'Etats membres  qui n'ont pas suscité de graves problèmes de personnel parce que les contingents  de fonctionnaires attribués aux Etats qui s'étaient retirés n'étaient pas  suffisamment importants pour perturber la composition du Secrétariat. Maintenant,  ce n'est plus le cas : 1'Etat qui s'est retiré dispose d'un contingent de fonc-  tionnaires très important et les Etats qui menacent de se retirer disposent  également de contingents de fonctionnaires très importants. Les effets de ces  retraits sur la composition du Secrétariat et sur son fonctionnement sont donc  considérables et nous obligent à nous pencher sur la situation. Nous ne pouvons  pas nous dérober derrière des règlements qui n'ont pas prévu cette situation, et  je pense que même ceux qui brandissent les règlements lorsque nous parlons de  cette question ne croient pas eux-mêmes que l'application stricte du règlement  pourrait permettre à l'Organisation de poursuivre ses activités dans l'harmonie.  Donc, la principale conséquence du retrait d'Etats membres du point de vue du  personnel, c'est le déséquilibre qu'il introduit dans la répartition géographique  des fonctionnaires.
13.16 Le deuxième problème qui se pose, c'est la nécessité dans laquelle va se  trouver l'organisation de réduire ses effectifs. Selon quelle règle va-t-elle  procéder pour opérer ces compressions ? Je pense que le Directeur général lui-  même refuserait que cette responsabilité repose uniquement sur lui et que, vu la  gravité des décisions que le Directeur général sera amené à prendre, il importe  que nous lui donnions au moins des directives reposant sur des principes généraux  sur lesquels il pourra se baser pour justifier sa propre action.
13.17 C'est compte tenu de ces deux aspects du problème que nous avions  proposé - la délégation de mon pays, ainsi que d'autres délégations - un projet  de résolution qui a été examiné à la Commission administrative. Comme le Pré-  sident de la Commission administrative l'a fait remarquer, ce débat a été très  difficile, mais il nous a été possible de nous entendre sur un texte qui prend en  compte les préoccupations de tous. I1 importait tout d'abord de ne pas boule-  verser les statuts et les règlements en vigueur - ce n'était d'ailleurs dans  l'esprit de personne : il ne s'agissait pas de faire soudainement de l'Orga-  nisation une organisation hors-la-loi. L'Organisation a ses règlements, ses  statuts, elle doit s'y tenir mais les éléments de ce statut peuvent revêtir une  importance relative différente selon les situations dans lesquelles elle se  trouve. Et à l'heure actuelle, le facteur qui devient prééminent dans les  règlements en vigueur et les critères qui y sont mis en évidence c'est le facteur  de la répartition géographique.
13.18 C'est pourquoi, dans le texte qui a été adopté par consensus à la  Commission administrative, il est fait référence, presque à chaque paragraphe du  texte adopté, de ce critère de la répartition géographique équitable. Ce qui  signifie pour nous que, lorsque le Directeur général aura à prendre des décisions  en matière de recrutement, de renouvellement de contrat ou de licenciement, ce  facteur de la répartition géographique équitable devra occuper dans ses pré-  occupations une place très importante, sinon la plus importante. C'est ainsi en  tous cas que nous comprenons le texte que nous avons accepté, et c'est d'ailleurs  ainsi qu'on peut le lire, compte tenu de l'insistance qui est placée dans le  texte sur ce critère.
13.19 Du reste, je ne pense pas que nous ayons fait en la matière oeuvre  d'originalité. Que l'on me corrige si je me trompe, mais il me semble que,  lorsque le BIT a été amené à faire des compressions de personnel, il a également  mis en exergue ce critère de la répartition géographique équitable. Et je pense  que, si cela a été fait au BIT, c'était en vertu des mêmes préoccupations que  celles que je viens d'exposer à la Conférence générale.
13.20 Monsieur le Président, en ce qui concerne ce texte de consensus, si  personne ne le remet en cause, si aucun amendement tendant à en changer la teneur  et le fond n'est proposé, nous nous y tiendrons nous aussi. Mais tel ne serait  pas le cas si ce texte était remis en cause et si certaines délégations voulaient  y apporter des modifications inacceptables pour nous.
13.21 Pour ce qui concerne les autres points traités dans le document 23 (2193,  nous n'avons pas encore élaboré de texte de résolution. Nous sommes en train de  le faire, Monsieur le Président. Plusieurs délégations, dont la mienne, ont  l'intention de soumettre à la Conférence générale un texte répondant aux ques-  tions qui sbnt soulevées dans le document 23 Cj93. C'est pourquoi, Monsieur le  Président, je souhaiterais que lorsque ce débat sera terminé, le Bureau fixe la  date à laquelle nous nous réunirons à nouveau pour adopter des décisions.
13.22 Monsieur le Président, bien que vous ayez clos la liste des orateurs, je  souhaiterais que vous puissiez me redonner la parole si, à la fin du débat,  j'estimais utile de répondre à certains des arguments qui auront été présentés au  cours des débats. Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président.
14. Le PRESIDENT :
1 ' Inde.  Je remercie le délégué de l'Algérie, et je passe la parole au délégué de
15.1 Mr KAUL (India) :  Thank you, Mr President. I do not intend to make a very long interven-  tion in view of the already detailed comments that have been made by the two  previous speakers. I should like to express our gratitude to the Chairman and the  members of the Legal Committee and the Administrative Commission for the diffi-  cult task they have performed in the light of the terms of reference that were  given to them. I propose, Mr President, first of all to deal with the Legal Com-  mittee's report and then come to the Administrative Commission's report.
15.2 The Legal Committee was authorized under its terms of reference to  consider only the strictly legal aspects of the matters concerned. And I think it  has done so commendably. There may be political connotations or there may not be.  But they were asked to consider this matter strictly from the legal point of  view. Mr President, I would appeal to my distinguished colleagues in the General  Conference that we consider these matters in a spirit of calm and serenity and  not be moved unduly by the present crisis which we seem to face. Such crises can  occur from time to time, and it is, I think, the right as well as the duty of the  General Conference to lay down general guidelines as it deems fit to meet the  situations as they may arise. I am told that it is not the first time we have  faced such a crisis; and this is not the last time either. Therefore, I think it  would be fit and proper for the General Conference to lay down certain  guidelines.
15.3 With regard to the question of observer status, Mr President, I had  occasion to remark both in the Executive Board and in the General Committee that,  just because a Member State decides to withdraw from this Organization or issues  a notice of withdrawal, this does not necessarily mean that it is permanently  withdrawing from this Organization. And if the according of observer status helps  that State to make up its mind, or reconsider its decision, or not to give effect  to the notice it may have issued, I think in that case, in the interst of the  Organization and in the interest of promoting, if not preserving - because my  distinguished Canadian colleague had an objection to the world preserving - the  universal character of this Organization, I think it is desirable for the General  Conference to lay down certain guidelines or to direct the Executive Board to  decide the terms and conditions, the mutual rights and obligations, on the basis  of which observer status may be granted to a withdrawing State, a State that has  withdrawn or a State that intends to withdraw and which, on such withdrawal,  requests observer status.
15.4 Without going into too much detail, Mr President, I would suggest, just  for consideration, a simple draft resolution that would read as follows so far as  observer status is concerned:  The General Conference,  Takes note of the Legal Committee's report;  Directs the Executive Board, on the basis of the principles mentioned in  paragraph 8 of the Legal Committee's report, to determine the terms and  conditions on which observer status may be accorded to a withdrawing  State that may request such observer status. I would suggest something  along those lines; the exact wording could be worked out.
15.5 So far as the question of a reference to the International Court of  Justice is concerned, I understand that a reference was made in 1956 or there-  abouts when some members of the Secretariat were dismissed during a period when  there was a hunt for certain political views held by them. Whatever the rights or  wrongs may be, or the merits may be, of those views, the International Court of
844    Justice - I understand - upset that decision to dismiss those officialS. So this  is .not the first time that reference to the International Court of Justice has  been made by Unesco. Nothing prevents us from making such a reference if we deem  it necessary. The idea is not, Mr President, to'challenge a State that has with-  drawn or a State that intends to withdraw: the idea is to provide for some  directives, for some well-considered opinion, that would help us in the future.  Article 11.6 of our Constitution says: 'Any Member State or Associate Member of  the Organization may withdraw from the Organization by notice addressed to the  Director-General. Such notice shall take effect on 31 December of the year  following that during which the notice was given. No such withdrawal shall affect  the financial obligations owed to the Organization on the date the withdrawal  takes effect'. Now there seems to be a difference of opinion between Unesco and  the State that has withdrawn. Such cases may arise in the future. I think it  would therefore be not only desirable but necessary for us to know where we  stand. And an advisory opinion of the International Court of Justice would help  both this Organization and Member States which may intend withdrawal to know  where they stand vis-à-vis one another.
15.6 I would therefore, to be very brief, suggest a draft resolution some-  thing along these lines:  The General Conference,  Takes note of the Legal Comittee's report:  Decides that the Executive Board study the matter:  Authorizes the Board to  (a) formulate the appropriate reference to the International Court of  Justice;  (b) advise the Director-General to make a reference to the Inter-  national Court of Justice accordingly while he is continuing  negotiations simultaneously with the State that has withdrawn or  may withdraw in the future.  I am not sticking to the exact wording of this formulation, Mr President, but  merely suggesting the lines along which the General Conference may like to take a  decision and give such brief guidelines to the Executive Board. I am suggesting  that this matter be referred to the Executive Board and that the Board be auth-  orized to formulate the terms in which a reference should be made to the Inter-  national Court of Justice because if we do not authorize the Executive Board in  this regard, and if we refer the matter again to the next General Conference, two  more years will have passed and we will still be where we are today. In fact,  when notice of withdrawal was given by the Member State that has already with-  drawn, I along with some other delegations of the Board had suggested at that  very time that we examine the desirability of making a reference. Mr President, I  think we should not be overtaken by events as we have been this time: we should  be forewarned, because to be forewarned is to be forearmed. I shall not say more  on this matter at this stage, Mr President, but I reserve the right of my  delegation to come back again on this point should it be necessary in the light  of observations that other delegates may wish to make.
15.7 Now with regard to the Administrative Commission's report, my delegation  was one of the co-sponsors, along with Algeria and some other countries, of the  original draft resolution in the Administrative Commission. I am very happy to  note that the distinguished delegates of Algeria and Jamaica have worked very  hard indeed to provide us with a consensus that seems to meet the wishes of  almost all the members of this Conference. However, two reservations have been  made. And I would endorse what Mr Rahal said: it is a delicate consensus, it is a  fragile consensus and we should try to go along with it. I would therefore appeal  to the two distinguished delegates who have made reservations to reconsider the  matter and not insist on the reservations in the light of the consensus that  seems possible and desirable.
15.8 Mr President, for my delegation this is not a matter of vendetta or  vengeance or threatening the nationals of a Member State that has withdrawn or  that may withdraw in the future. This, Mr President, is an important subject  because it would not be fair to impose this difficult task, and the responsi-  bility for resolving it, on the Director-General alone. The Director-General is  certainly responsible for implementing the programme as approved by the General  Conference. But the Director-General has requested, and rightly so, certain  guidelines from the General Conference, which is the supreme body of Unesco. It  is therefore not only desirable but necessaky, as I said, to provide some guide-  lines to him. And all that the resolution - the consensus resolution - tries to
845    achieve is to provide these guidelines in a spirit of equity and fairness, pre-  serving the legitimate rights of international civil servants according to the  international civil service regulations as well as the staff rules, and also  taking into consideration the human elements involved in each case. Of course,  the General Conference cannot deal with each and every case; and we have to leave  it - with a '  certain amount of flexibility - to the discretion of the Director-  General under these broad quidelines, to determine all the three important  matters that have been raised in this consensus and which were referred to us by  the Executive Board, namely new recruitment - on which there seems to be no  difference and on which Staff Rule 104 is quite clear - and, secondly, the  renewal or non-renewal of fixed-term contracts which may have expired. There  again, Mr President, I think the Director-General should be told that, while it  is at his discretion to combine the principles laid down in Article VI of the  Constitution, that is, the principle of securing the highest degree of compet-  ence, integrity, etc. and as wide a geographical distribution as possible,  supplemented by the resolutions adopted by the General Conference itself in the  past concerning equitable geographical distribution, I think that both these  considerations have to be borne in mind when deciding whether contracts which  have expired should or should not be renewed. The discretion should be left to  the Director-General, byt within these broad guidelines. Lastly, there is the  question of terminating the services or reducing the numbers of staff because of  the financial stringency we are facing today. This is inevitable, Mr President.  But, in determining whose services should be terminated first and whose later, I  think, other things being equal, competence being equal, preference has to be  given to the nationals of Member States that are members of this Organization  over those who have withdrawn or are not Member States. I am not saying this only  to deal with the present situation, but with a view to meeting such situations as  they may arise in the future. However, if in certain exceptional cases, either  with reference to human considerations or considerations of extraordinary merit,  if the Director-General feels that such removals should not take place or such  contracts should be renewed, then we should give him the discretion and authority  to do so.
15.9 Subject to those general remarks, Mr President, I would commend the  consensus resolution that has been recommended to us by the Administrative Com-  mission for approval by consensus of the General Conference. I reserve my right  to ask for the floor again should it be necessary in the light of remarks that  other delegates may make. Thank you, Mr President.
16.1 Le PRESIDENT :  Je remercie le délégué de l'Inde et je le prie de bien vouloir nous  remettre le texte du projet de résolution qu'il vient de présenter afin que nous  puissions le faire traduire et distribuer aux délégations pour un examen plus  approfondi.
16.2 J'invite maintenant le délégué de la République arabe syrienne à prendre  la parole.
(17.1) M. ABD0 (République arabe syrienne) (traduit de l'arabe),:  Merci, Monsieur le Président. Après les explications détaillées fournies par  les orateurs qui m'ont précédé, je serai bref, Monsieur le Président, afin de ménager  le temps dont dispose cette Conférence. Je voudrais tout d'abord remercier les prési-  dents du Comité juridique et de la Commission administrative pour les efforts qu'ils  ont consacrés à la préparation de ce document. Monsieur le Président, j'ai participé  aux débats auxquels ont donné lieu ces questions au sein du Conseil exécutif. Etant  donné leur importance, je me permets, au nom de la délégation de la République arabe  syrienne, d'insister sur la nécessité de trouver des solutions et de répondre à ces  questions que les règlements de l'Unesco laissent sans réponse. I1 s'agit en l'occur-  rence du droit qu'a un Etat qui se retire de l'organisation d'y maintenir une mission  d'observation et de l'octroi à celle-ci de toutes les facilités nécessaires, ainsi  que de la possibilité de demander un avis consultatif à la Cour internationale de  justice en ce qui concerne la définition des droits et des obligations réciproques de  l'organisation et d'un Etat membre qui s'en retire et qui pourrait avoir le statut  d'observateur, et en particulier de l'aspect financier de cette question. Rappelons  que si ces droits et obligations ne sont pas clairement fixés par les règlements de  l'organisation, ils n'ont pas non plus été définis par les règles et la pratique du  droit international.
(17.2) Dans ce contexte, nous sommes d'accord pour estimer que la Conférence géné-  rale pourrait définir un cadre et des principes généraux propres à garantir les  droits de l'organisation, de façon que le Conseil exécutif puisse étudier ces prin-  cipes et prendre les dispositions nécessaires à la lumière de ceux-ci. Aussi  appuyons-nous les propositions présentées dans les rapports du Comité juridique et de  la Commission administrative, notamment en ce qui concerne le recrutement du person-  nel. Bien que nous ayons apprécié les compétences des fonctionnaires ressortissants  d'un Etat qui s'est retiré de l'organisation, auxquels nous reconnaissons un statut  international, il est juste que ne soient pas mis sur le même plan, d'une part, les  ressortissants d'un Etat membre qui adhère aux principes de l'Unesco et contribue à  son soutien et, d'autre part, les ressortissants d'un Etat qui s'est soustrait à ses  responsabilités internationales. Sans doute est-ce cette position qui nous a amenés a  engager un tel débat en dépit du droit qu'a cet Etat, en sa qualité d'Etat souverain,  de se retirer de l'organisation. Bien que nous soyons favorables à ce que la préfé-  rence et la priorité soient accordées aux membres du personnel ressortissant d'Etats  membres, nous ne voulons pas pour autant porter préjudice aux fonctionnaires ressor-  tissant d'un Etat qui s'est retiré et à leurs familles ; aussi pourrait-on mettre en  place un mécanisme leur assurant des indemnités de cessation de service. De plus,  l'égalité de traitement irait à l'encontre du principe d'une répartition géographique  équitable.
(17.3) A notre connaissance, le contact n'a jamais été rompu entre l'Organisation  et 1'Etat membre qui s'en est' retiré. Le Conseil exécutif a reporté à plusieurs  reprises l'étude de ces questions en attendant que des solutions leur soient appor-  tées. Mais tel n'a pas été le cas et il a donc fallu s'efforcer de clarifier et ré-  examiner les règlements de l'organisation à cet effet.
(17.4) Monsieur le Président, malgré le fragile équilibre auquel a fait allusion le  Président de la Commission administrative et qui ne nous satisfait pas pleinement,  nous nous sommes efforcés et nous efforcons toujours de parvenir à un accord. Nous
847    approuvons les rapports et le projet de résolution qui a été présenté, de meme que  nous soutenons ce qu'a dit le délégué de l'Algérie au sujet du document 23 C/93. NOUS  croyons que des réformes et une rationalisation sont possibles mais qu'elles doivent  venir de l'intérieur de l'Organisation et non de l'extérieur. Nous avons besoin de  cette Organisation, Monsieur le Président, afin de préserver les valeurs et les  idéaux auxquels nous sommes attachés. Aussi devonsaous tous la soutenir afin  d'assurer sa survie et son 'développement. Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président.
18. Le PRESIDENT :  représentant du Royaume-Uni à prendre la parole.  Je remercie le délégué de la République arabe syrienne et j 'invite le
19.1 M. GORDON (United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland):  Thank you, Mr President. This is an important discussion; its course and  outcome will be followed very closely by ministers, press and public opinion in  my country and elsewhere. Inevitably, it will be seen as an important test case  of our political will and of our wisdom. And I must stress, Mr President, the  importance of reaching agreement between us, acceptable to all on the basis of  real consensus. The United Kingdom will contribute in this spirit.
19.2 Mr President, there are three very sensitive and difficult issues before  us. I turn to the first: the criteria for staff dismissals. This was, of course,  referred to the Administrative Commission. In the course of lengthy formal and  informal discussions, very many Member States expressed their strong difficulties  with any attempt to introduce what would in fact be a new principle into the  United Nations system: that of discrimination on the basis of nationality in  considering individual cases in making staff reductions. They pointed out the  strong objections to this principle which went against the whole spirit and word-  ing of existing staff rules and regulations which in their turn reflect the  deeply held principles of the United Nations common system. I am glad, Mr Presi-  dent, that the force of these objections has been increasingly recognized.
19.3 I am glad, Mr President, that thanks to the co-operation above all of Mr  Rahal and Mr Wynter in the Administration Commission, a further text has been  prepared and introduced. This, Mr President, in the view of my authorities very  much represents the basis for an agreement between us; but I have to say,  Mr President, that we had one or two remaining queries, one or two remaining  doubts, which led our representative in the Administrative Commission to request  time in order to have further informal consultations. This was in accordance with  a recommendation of the Temporary Committee which says that reaching consensus  takes time and appropriate procedures for consultation and co-ordination among  Member States, including informal consultations.
19.4 Mr President, I regret to say that this request was not accepted. I  think that if it had been, we would have been able at that meeting to adopt the  draft resolution before the Commission with no difficulties. And I must say that  when our representative put forward our remaining concerns it did not seem poss-  ible that these would be taken fully into account, and I think, Mr President that  it is important that they should be so; the more so, Mr President as the text  before us in document 23 C/102 Add. and Corr. does not seem the same in detail as  that which I understood emerged from the Commission meeting on Saturday. Let me  yo through the remaining points where we must have a decision.
19.5 In operative paragraph l(c) of the draft resolution, it was - I under-  stand - suggested in the Commission that you cannot use the word 'always' here  because Staff Rules 104.2 allows for exceptional circumstances and therefore it  is both logical and necessary to omit that word. It was my understanding that  this had been agreed but the word does appear to have crept back into the text.
19.6 Secondly, Mr President, I turn to (a); and there again I was informed  that the necessary reference, which we always put in when we refer to geographi-  cal distribution, taken from Article VI.4 of the Constitution, had been agreed:  this is the famous wording, 'Subject to the paramount consideration of securing  the highest standards of integrity, efficiency and technical competence ...'. It  should come after the words 'the Director-General', and then the remaining three  lines are unchanged. I think, Mr President, that this is essential; I understand  that no one objected to it in the Administrative Commission; it may simply be a  typographical oversight. But for balance, to respect the Constitution, this must  obviously go in.
19.7 Finally, Mr President, I come to paragraphs 2 and 3 and let me say again  what our representative said in the Administrative Commission: we are worried  about this wording; we do not understand it; it seems to us either unnecessary,  or harmful. It seems to us unnecessary in that the text before us is designed to  represent an important decision from the supreme body of Unesco, and it seems to
848    us that if we call for further study then this reduces the significance of what  we are going to achieve here without adding anything. It is, after all, both the  responsibility and indeed the duty of the Director-General to bring to the atten-  tion of the Board any problems which may arise, and we have full confidence that  the Director-General will fulfil this duty. But Mr President, let us leave the  initiative with him.
19.8 Now Mr President, it seems to us potentially harmful, in that this could  be seen (I am sure this is not the intention of the sponsors, but nevertheless it  could be seen) as a way of re-opening what are difficult, divisive and sensitive  issues, which we hope to deal with at this meeting. So Mr President, we have  doubts. It may be that those who drafted this wording can explain just what is  meant, can inform us that we are wrong, that our apprehensions are misconceived  and so on, in which case obviously we would reconsider. But, Mr President, I  think if such an explanation cannot be forthcoming, it is desirable to omit this  wording as unnecessary or harmful.
19.9 NOW, Mr President, I heard what Mr Rahal said about re-opening consen-  sus and so on, but I think this is a two-way process. I have said that this  represents an acceptable basis; what I am suggesting amounts to tidying up the  text, getting wording agreed which we thought had been agreed on Saturday, and  querying two of the paragraphs. I hope very much that with satisfaction given on  these points we can reach agreement; it is not always possible to do so with 150  States willing to help and contribute in plenary, and it may be that we should  refer this to a more informal mechanism and then I am sure, Mr President, that  with goodwill all round we can rapidly reach a decision. But, Mr President, it  would be a great mistake to try and force this to a vote on the basis of the  existing text today.
19.10 Now, Mr President, let me turn to the second sensitive issue which comes  out this time from the Legal Committee and this is the question of observer  status. The Chairman has introduced the discussion, the key paragraphs giving  conclusions are 7, 8 and 9; but I have to say, Mr President, that since the word-  ing in paragraphs 7 and 8 refers to the Legal Committee as a whole, whereas para-  graph 9 makes it quite clear that some members did not agree, it would be mis-  leading to talk about recommendations from the Committee: there is no doubt that  views were divided and the Committee was unable to come to conclusions by consen-  sus, which it could all agree with.
19.11 Now, Mr President, what are our problems with the wording of para-  graphs 7 and 8? Let me explain, because - as Mr Rahal and others have said - this  is indeed an important point. The Legal Committee was asked to confine itself to  the strictly legal aspects of the question before it. In our firm view, in para-  graph 8 it has wandered into arcas of policy and has included a number of  assertions which have no basis in law. Let me explain, Mr President: it is  absolutely clear in international law that there should be no discrimination in a  treatment of a State which is withdrawing from an organization and that of a  State which is not yet a member. Article 83 of the Vienna Convention on the  Representation of States in Their Relations with International Organizations of a  Universal Character provides that there should be no such discrimination, no dis-  crimination between States.
19.12 The procedures, rights and obligations established in law and practice  are as follows. First, a state has a right to notify the organization that it  proposes to establish an observer mission (Article 5(3) of the Vienna Conven-  tion). Secondly, as was well stated by the Director-General in his oral report to  the 121st session of the Executive Board: 'The Head of the Organization to whom  the appointment of an observer mission has been duly notified acknowledges  receipt of the notification to the State concerned. The mission is considered to  be established once such receipt has been acknowledged and may thereupon begin to  discharge its functions'. Third, the Executive Board should then consider the  granting of facilities. There is no basis in law for the Organization taking dis-  criminatory - indeed, it may be suggested, punitive - action against a State  which has withdrawn merely on the grounds that it has withdrawn. Fourthly, the  State which has established an observer mission and is granted facilities should,  if it is the established practice, negotiate a contribution towards the payment  of facilities granted to it.
19.13 Mr President, Article 7 of the Vienna Convention, lays down the func-  tions (but in no way mentions the obligations) of a observer mission. These are  threefold: first, to ensure the representation of the sending State and safeguard  its interests in relation to the Organization and maintain liaison with it;  secondly, to ascertain activities in the Organization and report thereon to the  Government of the sending State; and thirdly, to promote co-operation with the  Organization and negotiate with it.
19.14 Mr President, the principle stated in paragraph 8ía) (i) of the Legal  Committee's report is mistakenly taken from Article 6 of the Vienna Convention,  which deals not with observer missions but with states which are members of the  Organization. And, Mr President I have to add that the principle stated in para-  graph 8(a) (ii) is self-evidently incompatible with the functions of an observer  mission. Let me quote on this from the leading international law authority on  observer status, who says: 'The extent to which, in any concrete case, non-Member  States decide to co-operate with an international institution is a matter for  their own decision. No international institution can force them to do so against  their will'.
19.15 Mr President, the principle in paragraph 8(d) is based upon a miscon-  ception of the procedure concerning the establishment of an observer mission,  which I have set out earlier in this intervention.
19.16 So, Mr President, I have to say that the view of my legal authorities is  that the principles laid down in paragraph 8 of the Committee's Report are not  only wrong in law, they are also in our view objectionable on grounds of policy.  The Organization should maintain contact with withdrawing states which wish to  establish an observer mission. The principles laid down in paragraph 8 are  vaguely formulated and might be used punitively to destroy this contact.
19.17 Additionally, Mr President, there are very practical considerations and  queries cogently raised by Mr Wilson of Canada. So, Mr President, you will see  that we have a number of rather serious problems in this area.
19.18 But, Mr President, by contrast I would like to congratulate the Com-  mittee on what was achieved on the third sensitive point: the question of  requesting an advisory opinion from the International Court of Justice. There,  very properly, Mr President, the Committee has stuck to its legal mandate. I will  not, Mr President, speak at any length on this; other succeeding speakers are  more wise on these matters. Let me simply say that in my government's view it  would be highly undesirable on both practical and political grounds to ask the  International Court of Justice for an opinion.
19.19 Mr President, let me return to my opening remarks. I hope and believe  that we shall be able to reach an agreement here, not I suspect today, but in the  very near future; that this will be in full respect for international law and  that common sense and moderation will prevail. Mr President, finally, like  Mr Rahal and Mr Kaul before me, I reserve my right to come back later in the  debate. Thank you.
20. Le PRESIDENT :  à prendre la parole.  Je remercie le délégué du Royaume-Uni. J'invite le délégué du Venezuela
(21.1) M. ROCHE (Venezuela) (traduit de l'espagnol) :  Merci Monsieur le Président. Le fait que mon pays ait été constamment asso-  cié aux travaux du Comité juridique et de la Commission administrative me dispense de  commenter les rapports de ces organes. Je précise simplement que la position du  Venezuela en ce qui concerne le passage pertinent du document 23 Cl93 et du docu-  ment 23 CI102 figure aux paragraphes 2 et 3 du document 23 C/ADM/5 et aux pages 1 et
2 du document 23 CI102 respectivement.
(21.2) Fondamentalement, le Venezuela estime que les citoyens des Etats-Unis, car  je n'ai pas peur de nommer 1'Etat dont nous parlons, ne doivent faire l'objet  d'aucune discrimination et être traités comme les autres membres du personnel, sauf  quand il s'agit de nouveaux contrats, auquel cas il convient de donner la priorité  aux citoyens des Etats membres. Cela dit, et pour tenir compte du large débat entamé  sur ce point comme de l'excellente formule de compromis proposée par les représen-  tants de l'Algérie et de la Jamaïque, nous avons finalement décidé d'appuyer en  l'état le document de compromis et nous souhaitons réaffirmer ici cet appui.
(21.3) I1 ne nous paraît pas inutile de rappeler la position exprimée par le Direc-  teur général à ce sujte dans son discours d'introduction au débat de politique géné-  rale (p. 28 du document 23 ClINF.19 (prov.)). "Sous réserve de nouvelles directives  des organes délibérants", (et c'est précisément de cela qu'il s'agit ici) "les fonc-  tionnaires de nationalité américaine devraient être maintenus en service et bénéfi-  cier de reconductions d'engagement dans les mêmes conditions et limites que les  autres membres du personnel, pour autant qu'ils s'acquittent de leurs fonctions à  l'entière satisfaction de leurs supérieurs hiérarchiques et qu'ils demeurent loyaux à  l'Organisation, et cela sans préjudice, bien entendu, des mesures qui seront prises  dans le cadre de la réduction et du redéploiement des effectifs et qui seront appli-  cables, sans discrimination ni privilège, à l'ensemble des membres du personnel".  Comme dit le proverbe espagnol, le coq ne chante pas plus clair. Nous sommes d'accord  avec cette prise de position, nuancée par l'introduction de divers points du compro-  mis proposé par l'Algérie et la Jamaïque.
(21.4) Nous étions également représentés au sein du Comité juridique par le Dr René  de Sola qui a exprimé très clairement son point de vue et il n'est donc pas néces-  saire d'y revenir. Néanmoins, en accord avec lui, nous souhaitons formuler à propos  des questions posées par le délégué du Canada les observations ci-après.
(21.5) En premier lieu, si l'on se fonde sur les textes réglementaires de l'Unesco  que nous avons consultés, le statut d'observateur n'existe pas. Au lieu de position  d'observateur, terme proposé par le représentant du Canada, il nous semble donc plus  juste de parler simplement de la qualité d'observateur. En second lieu, les pratiques  universellement acceptées n'ont pas empeché l'Unesco d'admettre la création d'une  mission d'observation. Troisit3mement, ces précédents ont été réglés en vertu d'une  procédure conforme aux dispositions de la Convention de Vienne sur la représentation  des Etats, texte qui meme s'il n'est pas encore en vigueur n'en constitue pas moins  aux yeux de nombreux gouvernements un pas important dans l'entreprise de codification  et de normalisation progressive du droit international. Quatriemement, compte tenu de  ce gui précède, chaque fois qu'un Etat communique à l'Unesco son désir d'établir une  mission d'observation, le Conseil exécutif et le Directeur général doivent examiner  le cas en se référant aux principes exposés au paragraphe 8 du document 23 C/103.
(21.6) En fait, bon nombre de reglement6 se referent à ce que l'on pourrait appeler  juridiquement des concepts indéterminés dont le sens précis dans chaque cas particu-  lier est laissé à l'appréciation de ceux qui doivent les appliquer. Quand on dit, par  exemple, que la validité d'un contrat repose sur la bonne foi des parties, c'est au  juge de décider de ce qu'il faut entendre par B.
(21.7) Pour finir, et très brièvement, nous sommes d'accord sur la possibilité de  solliciter l'avis consultatif de la Cour internationale de justice, mais nous jugeons  préférable de poursuivre prudemment les négociations bilatérales entre l'Unesco et  les Etats-Unis, car nous ne pensons pas que toutes les possibilités qu'elles  offraient sont déjà épuisées. En ce qui concerne la suggestion émanant, je crois, du  représentant de l'Inde, tendant à saisir à nouveau le Conseil exécutif pour qu'il  tranche, il nous semble que le Conseil s'est déjà déssaisi au profit de la Conférence  générale à laquelle il appartient maintenant de se prononcer et de maniere défini-  tive. J'ai terminé, Monsieur le Président, mais je me réserve, bien entendu, la pos-  sibilité d'intervenir à nouveau ultérieurement. Je vous remercie.
22. Le PRESIDENT :  prendre la parole.  Je remercie le délégué du Venezuela. J'invite le délégué du Kenya à
23.1 Mr MUHOHO (Kenya):  Thank you, Mr President. Like the other speakers, we would want to con-  gratulate the chairmen of both the Administrative Commission and the Legal Com-  mittee for very dedicated work. I had the chance of taking part in some of the  work of the Administrative Commission, and we know a lot of effort and goodwill  went into it, and we really do congratulate everybody for having worked so hard.
23.2 Mr President, it is the view of our delegation that what we really need  most at this Conference is to work for a basis which is broad enough so that we  can weather the current storm. Hopefully, this would give a chance for the dust  to settle and then we would probably be able to get clearer language. It is  because of this that we wou1.d want to support in principle the suggestion made by  the delegation of India, insofar as it concerns the observer status issue. Of  course, we have not seen the language, and we would want to see that: but broadly  what we think we would want to support is a chance of giving the Executive Board  and the Legal Committee a chance to clarify the language. We all know the  pressure under which they have been working, and therefore some of the language,  as the distinguished delegate of Canada has said, may not be clear. We would want  further clarification of the language. And maybe if we could get a resolution  which does give that chance back to the Executive Board and the Legal Committee,  it would look to us as a basis for further work, for further clarification of  this issue and for a future decision.
23.3 Mr President, we would also support a resolution that would give us a  chance to authorize the Executive Board to take a decision insofar as the ques-  tion of the financial obligations of a Member State are concerned. On this issue,  Mr President, it is our view that, besides going to the International Court of  Justice, any other possible route should be sought that could give us a solution.  I do not know whether it has been considered, but I would suggest that both the  Director-General and the Executive Board, in their further consultations with the  Member State concerned, might wish to go in for an arbitration; and that is the  kind of second point I would want to suggest be included in the Indian  delegation's suggested draft resolution. We should ask possibly for Unesco to  appoint an arbitrator, the concerned member also to appoint an arbitrator, and  possibly then ask the President of the International Court of Justice to appoint
23  a third arbitrator; and the three of them should be able to sit down and try and  find out if a solution can be reached. That would give us a chance of keeping  both the Organization and the Member State concerned talking, of opening dia-  logue; it would also give us independence of judgement; and, at the same time, it  would not be labelled as an effort to victimize a Member State. It would be the  proposal of my delegation that something of that nature should be done. But I do  also believe, Mr President, it would be helpful to add that, in the event of  there being no agreement on the question, then we could seek the opinion of the  International Court of Justice, instead of having to wait for two years.
23.4 Mr President, finally, I would want to support the consensus arrived in  the Administrative Commission and the Legal Committee on the issue of staff.  This, Mr President, we all know is a very sensitive, a human issue; it affects  the daily bread of many people and their children, their families. I believe that  the consensus that has been worked does take all these issues into account. If,  on the other hand, Mr President, the co-sponsors of the resolution, the Committee  and the plenary wishes to allow room for negotiation on language which does not  really affect the substance, I think that it is only fair that we should try to  do everything possible to enlarge the consensus. Anything that reopens the con-  sensus would be totally unacceptable to us; but, if there would be a language  that would be able to enlarge the consensus, it would be most welcome to us.  Thank you, Mr President.
24. Le PRESIDENT :  à prendre la parole.  Je remercie le délégué du Kenya. J'invite le représentant de l'Australie
25.1 Mr WHITLAM (Australia) :  Mr President, I thank you for giving me the opportunity to speak briefly  to the Administrative Committee's report and, at greater length, to the report of  the Legal Committee.
25.2 Australia was one of the 51 Member States whose delegations spoke in the  Administrative Commission. The Australian delegates at the meeting of the Com-  mission were of the belief that there was a consensus to adopt the draft resol-  ution which the Commission has recommended to the Conference and which is set out  on pages 4, 5 and 6 of 23 C/102 Add and Corr. We believe that the plenary should  adopt the resolution. Australia also supports the understanding of the Federal  Republic of Germany that, when it comes to the renewal or reduction of staff,  nationality cannot be a criterion. Australia also wishes to thank the distin-  guished representative of the Ukraine who was the Chairman of the Commission. It  is obvious to all of us who read the Commission's report that the members gave  relevant and thoughtful consideration to all aspects of the particularly diffi-  cult matters which were referred to it.
25.3 Mr President, Australia was a member of the Legal Committee chosen by  the twenty-second session of the General Conference. Like all members of the  Legal Committee, the Australian representative participated in the discussions.  And it will be noticed from the concise record of the discussion that, there  again, all the difficult issues, novel issues, were addressed by the members of  the Legal Committee. Australia would like to thank the distinguished representa-  tives of Tunisia and the Netherlands who were Chairman and Vice-chairman of its  sessions. There have been more sessions of the Legal Committee than were  originally scheduled. That indicates the difficulty and, in some cases, the  novelty of the matters which the Committee had to consider. And may I particu-  larly mention the valuable advice which was given to the Chairman, Vice-chairman  and committee members by Unesco's Legal Adviser.
25.4 Sir, the first of the matters which the Legal Committee had to discuss  was the examination and definition of the reciprocal rights and obligations of  the Organization and a Member State which withdraws and which might, on request,  have observer status. The Director-General promptly and wisely, in our view,  accepted the request by the United States for observer facilities. Thereafter,  all the processes of Unesco have been properly pursued by the Executive Board, by  this session of the General Conference, by the General Committee, and by the  Legal Committee. The Committee has submitted to plenary four principles for its  approval. Australia supports those four principles. Australia hopes that plenary  will approve them.
25.5 It has to be stated at the outset that, if Member States had been more  diligent in supporting the existing international convention on this subject,  then the Director-General, the Executive Board, the General Conference, the  General Committee and the Legal Committee would not have had to devote so much  time to this issue. In 1975, there was drawn up the Vienna Convention on the  Representation of States in Their Relations with International Organizations of a
85 3    Universal Character. That Convention enters into force when 35 States have  deposited their instruments of ratification or accession. So far only 23 States  have done so. If 35 States had lodged those documents, if the United States had  been among them, then this question would never have been the problem it has been  to us. It would have been solved right from the outset, without any difficulty,  any doubts; and I believe that, at least, we ought to learn from this that, if we  neglect an international instrument, the problems that gave rise to it will not  disappear, if we neglect to review an international instrument the problems that  gave rise to it will not disappear, they will not become simpler; in fact, they  may become more complex, they may become more urgent. And so it has been in this  case. I find it ironical that the distinguished delegate for the United Kingdom  presumes to criticize the principles submitted to plenary by the Legal Committee  on the grounds that the Legal Committee does not adhere totally or more closely  to the provisions of the 1975 Convention, because the United Kingdom - Australia  too, I readily admit - like the United States of America has not ratified or  acceded to that Convention. But it is surely ironical that the United Kingdom  should constantly refer to a Convention which, in 10 years, it has not seen fit  to adopt. And the reasons why the United Kingdom has not seen fit to adopt this
1975 Convention, as discussed with Australia in the intervening years, are  precisely the things which have led to the Legal Committee spelling out further  details.
25.6 As I understand it, the United Kingdom, the United States of America,  Australia, Canada and other what are often called like-minded States have not  hitherto ratified the 1975 Vienna Convention for two principal reasons. One is  that the interests of the host States have been unnecessarily and impractically  ignored by the 1975 Convention in favour of the interests of the sending States.  To illustrate, the 1975 Convention does not include provisions permitting the  expulsion of representatives by the host State by means of a declaration that the  individual is persona non grata. Again, the 1975 Convention does not require  representatives to notify host States of their arrival in their territory or  jurisdiction, or their departure from it. And the other reason why the United  Kingdom, the United States of America, Australia, Canada and like-minded States  have not hitherto ratified the 1975 Convention is that the relative positiions of  representative and observer missions under the Convention are too close, in view  of the fact that the permanent representatives are normally bound by the Consti-  tution, aims and purposes of the international body, the host, while the perma-  nent observers are not.
25.7 It is because it was thought over the last decade that the 1975 Conven-  tion gave would-be observers the automatic right to participate in conferences or  in international organizations - that is, in the work of international organiz-  ations of a universal character - that the Legal Committee has spelt out some of  these considerations. It is, in my respectful submission, altogether too glib,  too facile, too dogmatic to assert that the Legal Committee's principles sub-  mitted to plenary are wrong in law or that they wander into areas of policy. What  is any international instrument doing except determining matters of policy?  Matters of policy are not frozen in 1975 when the Vienna Convention was drawn up;  they are not frozen in 1945 when the United Nations Charter was drawn up; or in
1946 when Unesco's Constitution was drawn up. We are all living organisms, and we  must change as circumstances require or make desirable; and that is what the  Legal Committee has been doing. The Legal Committee is confronted with a situ-  ation which Unesco has to address. It was a circumstance which had not been in  the contemplation of those who drew the 1975 Convention. It is true enough that  some States for brief periods had suspended their participation in or their con-  tributions to various international organizations; conspiciously the United  States of America had done so. There had been some States which had withdrawn  from Unesco for a few months, or a year, or a year and a half. But this was not a  feature of international practice; the United Kingdom conspiciously had never  done so. It is only in the last 12 months that the United Kingdom has ever to my  knowledge or understanding withdrawn from an international organization or from  any organ of the United Nations.
25.8 In these circumstances, let us go back to the position of the 1975 Con-  vention. It was drawn up in March 1975. In November 1975, the United States of  America through its Secretary-of-State, Dr Kissinger, in the Ford administration  gave notice of withdrawal from IL0 or BIT - the first time that the United States  of America had ever formally withdrawn from any Specialized Agency of the United  Nations. It had suspended its activities or its contributions, but it had never  taken a formal step. I have little doubt that if the Vienna Convention had been  drawn up in March 1976, instead of March 1975, this new circumstance would have  been taken into account. But, of course, it has happened again. True enough, the  United States of America went back to IL0 in 1980; the Director-General of IL0  who had received the notice of withdrawal received the notice of rejoining. I am  not sure what was achieved by the withdrawal, but I shall leave that for the  historians and the political scientists. But it has happened again in the United
23  Nations system; it has happened again to a Specialized Agency; it has happened at  the hands of the largest contributor. As I said, with complete propriety - I  believe - the Director-General promptly acceded to the application of the United  States to have observer facilities. But another nation, an original State, once  upon a time the second largest contributor, now we observe, sunk to the fifth  place or so, has given notice of withdrawal. Do we then, in the Legal Committee,  quote the 1975 Convention as if nothing had happened? If the 1975 Convention were  being reviewed, there is no doubt it would take into account the matters which  the Legal Committee advises that the General Conference should take into acocunt.  It would spell them out. My country, Canada, the United States of America, the  United Kingdom have been at fault in not anticipating these matters. The 1975  Vienna Convention is a very clear example that we all, all of us, not just like-  minded States but also different-minded States, have to look at the instruments  that are in existence and see if they are adequate; and, if they are not ade-  quate, they should be reviewed, because sooner or later the problems which have  arisen under the original convention will recur. They have in respect of the 1975  Convention. And I find it ironical - if I may use the word a third time, I do not  want to be more offensive - that the United Kingdom, which has always objected,  as I understand it, to ratifying the 1975 Convention on the grounds that it gave  automatic right to anybody to attend a conference as an observer or to attend an  international organization as observer, and that all the conference or the State  could do would be to accept the application to be an observer, should be putting  forward that very proposition now. It is true that the 1975 Convention made no  distinction between States that had never attended conferences or been members of  organizations and those that had. It was a problem which was only quite spasmodic  and superficial up to that stage. But now it is a real problem. And if one can  look at the wire services, Unesco might not be the last of' the Specialized  Agencies which will receive a notice of withdrawal from founding members of those  organizations.
25.9 What, then, are we to do in Unesco? What is the Legal Committee to do? I  do not believe that one can criticize the Executive Board for taking account of  this matter, nor the General Conference, nor the General Committee, nor the Legal  Committee, nor the Chairman or Vice-chairman of the Legal Committee, nor the  members of the Legal Committee. We have dealt with something which has concerned  us, which may concern us again at the end of 1985; unless governments change  their minds, it will concern us again. Now are we to wait until our Member States  choose to review the 1975 Convention? But let us not hear any more of this argu-  ment that in Unesco we must automatically do what the 1975 Convention sets out,  that we should hear that from one of the countries which has objected to the  obligation to do these things automatically. What should we do? If there is  nothing objectionable in the 1975 Convention, why have not we all ratified it? If  there is something deficient in the 1975 Convention, there can be no objection to  our Legal Committee specifying the deficiencies. We know quite well when the 1975  Convention is reviewed, as reviewed it must be, then it will take into consider-  ation those matters which Unesco's Legal Committee has mentioned and has set out  as principles in its submission to plenary.
25.10 I need not go any further on this. My own predilection always is that  all our Member States here should participate actively in these instruments of  international law; and-that Unesco should collaborate with its brother or sister  Specialized Agencies in seeing that the whole United Nations structure is kept up  to date and that international instruments are kept to date.
25.11 I conclude: I see no objection whatever to the principles which have  been submitted by the Legal Committee to plenary. They will be of interest to any  other Specialized Agency which is being assaulted and aggravated and undermined  as we have been. They will be taken into account by any conference reviewing the
1975 Convention; and the sooner there is such an international convention the  better it will be. But I would hope that by then Australia will take a more con-  structive attitude than it has in the last ten years.
25.12 I now turn, Mr President, to the other matter before the Legal Com-  mittee - the study of the desirability of requesting the International Court of  Justice to deliver an advisory opinion on the financial obligations of a Member  State which withdraws from the Organization in the course of a budgetary period.  The Legal Committee has drawn the attention of plenary to four points, and on  them the Legal Committee was unanimous. The objection was made to the first  matter in the Legal Committee's report that the principles were set out as coming  from the Committee and not from a majority of the Committee. What difference  would it have made? After all, if the Executive Board does something, we do not  spell out that a majority of the Executive Board decided. The majority is what  makes the decision. If the Legal Committee reports to you, can it only report if  it is unanimous? If you get a unanimous report, it will take a long time and it  might not really address all the matters which you have to consider. So, right,  the Legal Committee was not unanimous on the first issue. I suppose we could have
855    gone through a formula such as you would go through in reviewing the Vienna Con-  vention: you would take the principles point by point: you would have a vote if  necessary; you would have all the amendments point by point and take a vote if  necessary. In fact, Unesco has prided itself on coming to a consensus on most of  these things.' And, of course, on the second matter Unesco's Legal Committee did  come to a consensus. There is no dissent among its members on the four points  which have been brought to the attention of plenwy.
25.13 Among the matters considered by the Legal Committee was a most infor-  mative and valuable document submitted to the Executive Board on the 28 January  this year: it is 'The consequences of the withdrawal of a Member State from  Unesco. Report by the Director-General'. Its reference is 4 X/EX/2, and it  amounts to over 40 pages. I will not presume to summarize it. But I certainly  advise delegates to look at it because it is most valuable on the facts, the  history and the concepts which it sets out. And it sets them out very well  indeed.
25.14 There are two particular .matters to which I would direct attention. One  is the legal situation, as we understand it, of a State which withdraws its  financial obligations and the financial rights of Unesco as against the withdraw-  ing State. The opinions of four jurists - a working group - to the Director-  General are set out on pages 27 to 33 of the Director-General's report last  January to the Executive ßoard. Three of the international lawyers consulted were  of the opinion that a withdrawing State had to pay all the financial obligations  for the budgetary period of two years. The remaining international lawyer was of  the opinion that, in view of the provision of our Constitution, the withdrawing  State had only to pay for the period up to the date of withdrawal. Now it is  essential, I would think, when we are considering this question of going to the  International Court that we consider some other things which are not strictly  legal matters in the opinion of the Legal Committee. But they are matters that  which would have to be considered, I submit, by plenary. If any lawyer and any  aggrieved person are discussing going to court, there are some questions which  are inevitably discussed, matters which, even if not strictly legal matters in  the terms to which the Legal Committee considers itself restricted, are neverthe-  less very relevant matters. The aggrieved person and the lawyer would certainly  want to discuss the prospects of getting a favourable judgement or opinion from  the Court. They would then want to know, to discuss, what are the prospects of  recovering your verdict from the person whom you sue, or, in the case of an  advisory opinion from the International Court of Justice, what are the prospects  of the State accepting the advice, if the advice is against the State concerned.  Then there are some subsidiary matters: you have to consider how long will it  take you to get the judgement or the verdict or the opinion of the Court: what  will be the costs of those procedures: and you also have to consider what will be  the effect on other persons about whom the aggrieved person might think he has a  grievance. So let me go though those five issues.
25.15 I myself, with all respect, would not be convinced by the opinions of  the majority. I believe the opinions of the fourth member of the panel are quite  cogent. Rut, even so, I think you have to be very careful about going to court  with a three-to-one chance only. You need rather more of a chance than that in  general. One thing which occurs to me is this: our provision about the budget,  and about withdrawal, were laid down in our Constitution back in 1954. They have  never been changed since. Rut very clearly the International Court of Justice  would be looking at the things we did in 1954; and there might be a reasonable  presumption that the Court would take those things together, in association. Now  we did two things: one was to say that, after 1954, Unesco would not have an  ordinary session of the General Conference annually - it would have an ordinary  session every two years: it also said that the period for withdrawal should be at  the end of the year following that in which the notice was given. Now I would  think that you would have to contemplate the possibility of the International  Court of Justice stressing that this Specialized Agency set its budgetary period  for two years at the very time that it said that a State could withdraw in just  one year. I would think it would be extremely hazardous for us to seek an  advisory opinion from the International Court of Justice in those circumstances.  You would certainly not get a unanimous view in our favour; that is, we would  presumably only be going to the International Court of Justice if we thought  there was a reasonable prospect of getting an advisory opinion that the United  States had to pay for two years instead of one year. It has paid for one year. SO  the advice we would be seeking would be whether the United States would be  obliged to pay another year; that is all we would be going to the Court to find  out. And it seems to me that we could not be reasonably confident of getting an  advisory opinion in favour of two years. We set two-year budgets and one year's  withdrawal at the same session. Inevitably, many of the judges at the Inter-  national Court of Justice would be linking those two events and saying that,  knowing there was a two-year budget, we said that one year's withdrawal is  enough. If it comes to a vote in plenary, if it comes to a vote on the Executive
856    Board, Australia, as at present advised, would be voting against taking this  matter to the International Court of Justice.
25.16 Then there is the matter of the situation if you won the advisory  opinion. Incidentally, it is not a judgement; it is not a verdict. Most of us are  appalled at the attitude that the United States has taken towards judgements of  the International Court of Justice. Not many of us, particularly the superpowers,  the large powers, can take much pride in their attitude towards the International  Court of Justice. It is left to the smaller countries like Australia to accept  and to continue to accept the compulsory jurisdiction of the International Court.  But only 50 of us have done so; two-thirds of the members of Unesco have not  accepted the compulsory jurisdiction of the International Court of Justice. The  United States did until it lost over Nicaragua; and, despite the American bravado  that it would win an advisory opinion from the Court, it did not win the case on  Nicaragua - nowhere near, for only the American judge upheld their submission.  Again, Australia, New Zealand and FiJi took France to the International Court. We  won the case, so France withdrew from the Court, from its compulsory jurisdic-  tion. They did what America has now done. NOW, in view of that, where there was a  compulsory jurisdiction which the greatest and richest power in the world had  accepted, I could have no confidence that the United States would accept an  advisory opinion. Nobody has to accept an advisory opinion. If the United States  abandons its acceptance of the compulsory jurisdiction, what would be its atti-  tude towards an advisory opinion? Now we all know the answer to that. Are we to  go through the performance of seeking an advisory opinion, which could be quite  problematical as regards a finding in our favour, and where - without doubt - the  United States would not accept the advice? And how long would it take? We are  told it would take at least seven months. 7: would emphasize 'at least' , because  other Specialized Agencies could intervene, other States could intervene, and it  might take quite some time. International lawyers are not terse, they are not  taciturn. There are not a great number of cases coming before the International  Court of Justice. They are bonanzas when they come. And, although we would not  have to pay the costs if we did not get a favourable opinion, we would have to  pay the costs, in view of most of the members of the Legal Committee, of having a  lawyer or lawyers specializing in appearing before that Court. The Legal Com-  mittee cannot appear. It would not be fair to ask the Legal Adviser to appear.  It is true that an individual can appear before the ICJ; individuals  appeared. Whom do we send along, the President? It is not a fair burden; we would  have to employ international lawyers accustomed to appearing before the ICJ.
25.17 That would involve some cost, but the really great cost to the Organiz-  ation would be the distraction it would cause. The new Board, the Secretariat,  would be spending perhaps not as long as we have had to spend over the last two  years, but we would have to spend - all of us - scores of hours; the Organization  itself wou1.d continue to be distracted by this exercise just as we have been on  all the issues flowing from the United States withdrawal and the United Kingdon  notice of withdrawal. Quite frankly, Mr President, Unesco, the Secretariat, the  Executive Board, the Legal Committee have better things to which to turn their  attention, on which to spend their efforts. We have come to terms with the  American withdrawal; America will not be back for another three or four years in  my estimation. It stayed out of the IL0 for three years; it is very difficult for  any administration, or any government, to change its mind. So what good would be  served? We have adjusted with great diligence and dignity on the part of the  Director-General and the Secretariat and I believe on the part of the Executive  Board and the Temporary Committee to this traumatic experience; I do not believe  we should prolong it. Now that American membership is behind us, for another  three or four years, let us get to the constructive work to which we have been  successfully devoting ourselves over the last 18 months.
25.18 There is one other matter I want to consider in this respect. It is not  as if we have to settle this matter by seeking an advisory opinion even if we  were certain of securing a favourable opinion. We can alter our Constitution, we  can alter our Financial Regulations, just as we can alter our Staff Rules: it is  open to us to do it. The timetable, the majorities required are all set out; we  know them; the procedure is available for us to use. There has been a bit of a  hiccup in the very constructive and valid suggestion that the Philippines made  for altering the Constitution in respect of the financial obligations of a with-  drawing State. The Philippines withdrew that suggestion for the very worthy and  understandable objective, which I should have mentioned as the fifth of my  grounds against going to the ICJ, that it might trigger off a train of with-  drawals, that is to say, if it were suggested that this Conference, before the  end of 1985, would make it obligatory for a State to pay for two years if it  withdrew, then I would suggest that some more States would safeguard their rights  by giving notice straight away while the going was good, before the Constitution  was altered.
25.19 The wiser way to overcome that would be to use the formula that was used  in respect of the first report by the Legal Committee to this plenary, i.e. on  the transfer of Australia and New Zealand and of a Board seat from Group I to  Group IV; it was decided that the change should come into operation at the  twenty-fourth. session in 1987. In all events, what I would hope and believe (I  will not circulate an amendment at this stage but perhaps I will do it at some  other stage on behalf of Australia) would be that this session should not end  without having mandated the Board and the Legal Committee to consider appropriate  amendments to the Constitution to make the situation clear. For example, we may  want to specify that a withdrawing State only has to pay one year's contribution.  We might want to specify that a withdrawing State has to pay two years' contri-  butions. There can be no objection to having a two-year contribution payable,  because that is what happens in the ILO. In the ILO, the position is the reverse  to ours. We have a two-year budget period and a one-year withdrawal notice  period. IL0 has a one-year budget period and a two-year withdrawal period. And  whatever the United States objections to IL0 ('politicization' was the favourite  word in 1975)., in fact the United States had no objection to rejoining the IL0  later, with the two-year obligatory contributions. So at least the United States  could not object to having Unesco's contribution set at two years. But we do not  have to do that. Most of the Specialized Agencies have one year. In the document  to which I referred, the Director-General's report of 28 January last, you can  find what happens in respect of the other Specialized Agencies, on pages 7, 8  and 9.
25.20 What I would wish to advocate and to stress is that the Board and the  Legal Committee in this regard should always take into account the position, the  Constitutions, the practices of the other Specialized Agencies. The fact is that  the largest contributor, the greatest power in the world has assaulted IL0 and  now Unesco. Nobody reading the comments which were persuasive in the withdrawal  of the United States from Unesco can be confident that no United States Adminis-  tration would ever withdraw from any other Specialized Agencies. It is incumbent  on us, at present under assault, to fortify the whole system. If we do not stand  together we can be picked off one by one; and if you lose 25 per cent of your  budget, inevitably you will be damaged. Now at least we do not need an advisory  opinion from the World Court to save us. We have adjusted in Unesco, but we can  alter our Constitution, we can alter our Financial Regulations, or we can give an  interpretation ourselves which is binding on us in constitutional terms to clear  this matter for the future. But if we do so, we ought to take into account the  Constitutions, the Financial Regulations, the practices of the other Specialized  Agencies: the basic work and information is there.
25.21 Mr President, I regret having spoken so long on these matters, but I do  not believe I am just beiiig self-serving in saying that the Legit1 Committee has  addressed itself to matters which the plenary, the General Committee, bade it to  do; these are relevant matters that should, in my view, be accepted by plenary.  The Legal Committee expressly, deliberately, refrains from advising that we  should or should not seek an advisory opinion from the International Court of  Justice. I have gone on at this length because I want to state early that I  believe it would be an exercise in futility. We have adjusted. We can prepare for  the future under our own machinery. I do not believe that we should be distracted  by taking up our time and devoting our energies to an exercise from which in my  view we would not derive one cent. Thank you, Mr President.
26.1 Le PRESIDENT :  Mesdames, Messieurs, l'heure s'avance. Nous avons jusqu'à présent  entendu huit des orateurs inscrits sur une liste qui comporte plus d'une cin-  quantaine de noms. I1 se révèle impossible de tenir une séance de nuit au-  jourd'hui, et ce, d'autant que nous avons tous des engagements pour la soirée.  Par contre nous pourrions tenir une ou même deux séances dans la journée du
30 octobre, afin de conclure ce débat. Je vous donnerai plus de précisions à cet  égard cet après-midi.
26;2 Mesdames, Messieurs, nous nous retrouverons ici à 15 heures. La séance  est levée.  The meeting rose at 1.30 p.m.  La séance est levée à 13 h.30  Se levanta la sesión a las 13.30  +i + \>y. 'LUI cp '+i &>